There was a reorientation from the middle of the 1970 s as a result of more effective therapeutic possibilities.
A variety of complementary institutions, outpatient and partly inpatient therapies, which were recommended by the "Psychiatrie-Enquête", started to be realized.
Smaller units and different models of integration of psychiatric care, such as building the hospital next to a general hospital or psychiatric wards within a general hospital, became relevant criteria for planning the construction of psychiatric hospitals, as did the integration into the community and the city.
Principles of organization like the construction of a communicative quiet inner room, or grading the rooms from public to private, were structurally integrated.
Specific structural requirements for the construction and design of psychiatric hospitals should be evaluated in more detail by post-occupancy methods.
The coronal incision is a versatile approach to midface or skull base fractures.
It allows the open reduction of complex fracture sites and facilitates canthopexy, marginotomy or calvarian bone harvesting.
By this method, primary treatment can be optimised and the rate of secondary corrective surgery can be reduced.
All trauma patients who underwent this kind of intervention were re-examined to check functional and aesthetic results.
The complication rate was low and the advantages of these techniques are evident, so that it is suggested that the indication for this operative approach should be extended.
One case of a newly described, rare odontogenic tumor is reported.
A literature review of 19 cases lends support to the odontogenic origin and metastatic capability, both regionally and distantly, of the clear cell odontogenic tumor.
We conclude that this tumor is malignant, with a tendency to recur locally after surgery.
It requires an aggressive surgical approach and should be referred to as a clear cell odontogenic carcinoma.
In our patient we saw a clear cell odontogenic carcinoma and a squamous cell carcinoma, both with regional lymph node metastasis.
The histological differentiation of this type of tumor from other clear cell tumors is difficult.
As the elderly segment of our population expands, there is an increase of therapeutic problems considering this age group.
The elderly patient is generally susceptible to infections because of the decline in host defense mechanisms that occurs with aging, and the underlying chronic diseases of these patients.
Increasing numbers of elderly people are being treated in hospitals and are additionally at particular risk of acquiring nosocomial infections with antibiotic-resistant organisms.
This article focuses on the epidemiological considerations, risk factors, types of infections that occur in elderly patients, and the guidelines for empiric therapy.
The most common infections of the elderly are respiratory tract infection, urinary tract infection, and skin and soft tissue infection.
Empirical therapy should be broader in spectrum for elderly patients since the variety of infecting bacteria tends to be greater and the choice of antimicrobial therapy must be based on risk stratification (age, medical illnesses, and severity of presentation).
Many additional aspects, e.g., route of administration, drug pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics, drug toxicity and drug-drug interactions, compliance, and multiple underlying diseases (e.g., renal failure) must be considered in the rational selection of antibiotic regimen.
We present long-term results (minimum follow-up 5 years) in 145 patients with advanced non-seminomatous germ cell tumours, who underwent radical retroperitoneal lymphadenectomy (RPLA) after chemotherapy.
We correlated patients' outcomes (death of disease) to different kinds of chemotherapy and to intraoperative findings.
We found that patients who were treated by a modified Einhorn scheme with cisplatin, etoposide and bleomycin have a good prognosis.
In all, 90 % showed no evidence of disease (NED).
The NED rate was significantly lower in patients who were treated by sequential alternative chemotherapy (DOD = 37 %).We determined the following prognostic factors which predict a poor outcome:...
Follow-up studies after stent implantation of native coronary arteries have reported reduced rates of angiographic restenosis.
In contrast, stent implantation in the treatment of obstructive disease of coronary artery bypass grafts is complicated by higher restenosis rates.
We sought to determine, if different predictors contribute to the high restenosis rate following stent implantation of coronary artery bypass grafts.
We investigated long-term angiographic outcome of 205 stent implantations performed in 177 patients.
Multivariate analysis correlated clinical, procedural and angiographic variables with the incidence of angiographic restenosis defined as diameter stenosis >50% at follow-up.
Angiographic restenosis was observed in 34% of lesions treated.
Multiple logistic regression analysis defined diabetes mellitus (OR 6.89, CI2.41-9.69), graft recanalization (OR 2.69, CI 1.08-6.63), lesion at the aortic anastomosis (OR6.98, CI2.76-19.25), lesion at the coronary anastomosis (OR 2.95, CI1.18-7.49), high diameter stenosis after stent placement (OR 7.01, CI 2.64-15.71), placement of long stents (OR2.78, CI1.11-7.36) and implantation of more than one stent (OR7.34, CI2.08-20.15) as independent predictors of graft in-stent restenosis.
Critical consideration of these variables may help to identify patients who are poor candidates for stent implantation and who may benefit from different interventional approaches.
To compare the conventional 2-D, the simulator-guided semi-3-D and the recently developed CT-guided 3-D brachytherapy treatment planning in the interstitial radiotherapy of breast cancer.
In 103 patients with T1-2, N0-1 breast cancer the tumor bed was clipped during breast conserving surgery.
Fifty-two of them received boost brachytherapy after 46 to 50 Gy teletherapy and 51 patients were treated with brachytherapy alone via flexible implant tubes.
Single, double and triple plane implant was used in 6, 89 and 8 cases, respectively.
The dose of boost brachytherapy and sole brachytherapy prescribed to dose reference points was 3 times, 4.75 Gy and 7 times 5.2 Gy, respectively.
The positions of dose reference points varied according to the level (2-D, semi-3-D and 3-D) of treatment planning performed.
The treatment planning was based on the 3-D reconstruction of the surgical clips, implant tubes and skin points.
In all cases the implantations were planned with a semi-3-D technique aided by simulator.
In 10 cases a recently developed CT-guided 3-D planning system was used.
The semi-3-D and 3-D treatment plans were compared to hypothetical 2-D plans using dose-volume histograms and dose non-uniformity ratios.
The values of mean central dose, mean skin dose, minimal clip dose, proportion of underdosaged clips and mean target surface dose were evaluated.
The accuracy of tumor bed localization and the conformity of planning target volume and treated volume were also analyzed in each technique.
With the help of conformal semi-3-D and 3-D brachytherapy planing we could define reference dose points, active source positions and dwell times individually.
This technique decreased the mean skin dose with 22.2% and reduced the possibility of geographical miss.
We could achieve the best conformity between the planning target volume and the treated volume with the CT-image based 3-D treatment planning, at the cost of worse dose homogeneity.
The mean treated volume was reduced by 25.1% with semi-3-D planning, however, it was increased by 16.2% with 3-D planning, compared to the 2-D planning.
The application of clips into the tumor bed and the conformal (semi-3-D and 3-d) planning help to avoid geographical miss.
CT is suitable for 3-D brachytherapy planning.
Better local control with less side effects might be achieved with these new techniques.
Conformal 3-D brachytherapy calls for new treatment planning concepts, taking the irregular 3-D shape of the target volume into account.
The routine clinical application of image-based 3-D brachytherapy is a real aim in the very close future.
Background: Staphylococci represent an important source of external infections of the eye.
In addition to acute staphylococcal conjunctivitis a spectrum of subacute or chronic disease may be found.
According to Valenton und Okumoto, with this staphylococci-associated blepharo-kerato-conjunctivitis in culture-positive cases S. aureus is found in 31% and S. epidermidis in 69% of smears.
Microbiallergic and toxic mechanisms are the underlying etiology.
Multiple organ failure (MOF) may occur early or late after trauma.
Besides direct physical injury of organs, compromise of the microcirculation by inflammation plays an important role in the pathogenesis of MOF.
Inflammation also induces counterregulatory responses which may end up in immunoparalysis.
As a result, infection and sepsis with additional inflammatory damage to the microcirculation ensue thereby contributing to the late development of MOF.
In addition to this biphasic model of posttraumatic MOF, there is evidence that inflammation and immunoparalysis do not only occur in sequence to each other but in parallel early after surgical procedures.
The aim of the present brief review is to summarize the posttraumatic mechanisms of inflammation and immunoparalysis and to discuss how to differentiate between both pathophysiologic states.
Early enteral nutrition is widely accepted for its support of organ structure and function ("gut injury hypothesis") and reduction of infectious complications and hypermetabolism in critically ill postoperative or postinjury patients.
Nineteen severely injured patients (Injury Severity Score 40.3+/-11.6) were studied for the feasibility of early enteral nutrition via a duodenal feeding tube.
Despite maxillary fractures, rhinoliquorrhea and blunt abdominal trauma the enteral feeding was mostly started immediately after trauma.
Intermittent diarrhea or constipation resolved after reduction of the feeding rate within 1 or 2 days.
Total enteral nutrition could not be realized in all cases; a central venous line was always additionally necessary.
However, the goal was not complete enteral nutrition but a continuous enteral supply to maintain the integrity of the gut.
The study has shown that early enteral nutrition via a duodenal feeding tube is also feasible in severely injured patients.
The expenditure to overcome the technical and organizational problems seems to be justified.
Enterally fed patients may have a better outcome that those in whom only parenteral is employed.
Definition of the problem: The rapid pace of medical progress has drawn renewed attention to the various possible ways of treating dead or brain-dead pregnant women since the 1980's.
The discussion today revolves around medical, social, legal and economic aspects.
The historical areas of conflict which surrounded deliveries carried out on dead mothers (usually by means of a Sectio in mortua, nowadays known as a perimortem Caesarean section) and their significance in today's debate are, for the most part, regarded as being of little relevance.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia (PCP) is one of the most frequent infectious lung diseases in immunocompromised patients, especially in AIDS cases.
The present case report describes pulmonary miliary microcalcifications with and without foreign-body reaction in a patient with successfully treated PCP who was known to have AIDS.
This form of residues of completely healed PCP tends to be rare.
Other infectious granulomas, foreign-body granulomas and sarcoidosis must be differentially diagnosed.
After cautious decalcification, pneumocysts can be demonstrated with methamine silver (Grocott).
It is important to be aware that PCP can also undergo spontaneous cure, so that miliary microcalcifications may then be the sole pointer to the presence of AIDS.
Background: In congenital adrenal hyperplasia due to 21-hydroxylase deficiency high pre- and postnatal androgen levels are present and might influence psychosexual and psychosocial development in affected girls.
Methods: In order to study the impact of high androgen levels as well as chronic medication and repeated surgery on female patients life we performed a comprehensive quality-of-life study.
We report on the results obtained by structured interviews of adult patients (45) and their mothers (35) covering difficulties and problems in general, most aspects of their medical histology, self image, body image and current life with or without a male or female partner.
Results: The patients were socially competent with a well developed social network.
However, regarding sexual contacts they were shy and reluctant.
These resulted in significantly less patients live with a partner or are married.
Existing partnerships were more stable and satisfactory than in the control population.
The incidence of homosexuality was not increased.
The number of women having children was significantly reduced.
A substantial number of women suffered from androgen-dependent problems like irrgular menses and hirsutism.
Mothers and patients denied any sex-specific eduction, but the girls had preferred boy-specific toys and competitive outdoor games.
However, school performance was average and comparable to the controls.
Most mothers expressed problems and questions regarding their daughters intersexuality at birth.
Even though they felt they had received good medical treatment, mothers as well as patients felt they would have needed more psychological help.
Conclusions: It seems that adult female patients with congenital adrenal hyperplasia are able to adapt to their impairment and chronic disease.
Problems regarding partnership, sexuality, and fertility remain and have to be addressed.
Introduction: Orthotopic liver transplantation (OLT) has become an accepted treatment for end-stage liver disease.
However, postoperative complications result in significant patient morbidity and mortality.
Early detection and treatment of these complications is therefore of utmost importance.
Materials and methods: We retrospectively reviewed the postoperative complications of the patients who underwent OLT at our institution.
Duplex Doppler sonography and cholangiography were the primary imaging modalities in postoperative evaluation of the transplanted liver.
Other important techniques were CT, MRI, and angiography, which may contribute to a reliable diagnosis of vascular or biliary complications.
Results: Second to primary organ dysfunction, vascular complications are the most frequent cause of graft loss.
Thrombosis of the hepatic artery is the most common and most serious vascular complication, with a reported incidence from 4 to 42 %.
Bile duct sludge, leaks and strictures are frequent complications after liver transplantation, which can contribute to graft dysfunction.
Biliary tract complications usually occur within the first 3 months and require interventional radiological or surgical therapy.
Since liver transplant recipients undergo immunosuppressive therapy, they are at increased risk of developing late post-transplant malignancies, which are best depicted by US, CT or MRI.
However, radiological diagnosis of lymphoproliferative disorder has to be confirmed by liver biopsy.
Conclusion: Cholangiography and Duplex sonography are routinely used in the postoperative evaluation of patients with OLT.
CT, MRI, and angiography are problem-solving tools in equivocal cases.
Recurrence of colorectal carcinomas occurs in about 50 % of the cases with localized neoplasia.
It is understood that the tumor recurrence is due to residual micrometastases not found during surgery or extraregional (peripheral blood or bone marrow).
We developed a procedure to detect non-visible, abdominal metastases using a radiolabeled anti-tumor cell antibody injected before the operation (radioimmunoguided surgery, RIGS).
However, even with the best technique, it is not possible to remove all micrometastasis if a hematogenic dissemination happens.
Based on the knowledge of disturbing humoral immune reaction is mounted against shed tumor associated antigens (TAA), we developed a new method to reduce and correct the B cell response and B cell recruitment due to chronic TAA immun complex presentation on follicular dendritic cells (immune corrective surgery, ICS).
This method is based on a selective lymphadenectomy.
The target lymph nodes were those loaded with TAA-immune complex.
The detection method used was the injection of radiolabeled antibody able to recognize the immune complex.
From 20 patients (stage I, II and III) treated with ICS, 17 survived more than 5 years ' showing a statistically significant increase of survival compared to patients treated with standard procedures.
In conclusion, these data show that surgery of colorectal cancer should be selectively extended to specific anatomical regions in order to remove hidden micrometastases, and more importantly, correct postoperative immune processes that could suppress the T cell response against residual tumor cells.
Knowledge of normal and impaired pulmonary gas exchange is essential to the anaesthesiologist.
Analysis of an arterial blood sample allows evaluation of whether or not pulmonary gas exchange is normal.
For this purpose comparison with the oxygenation index or the alveolar-arterial PO2 difference is helpful.
Pathological changes of these variables are mainly caused by ventilation-perfusion (V.A/Q.)
In daily practice, venous admixture or intrapulmonary shunt can be calculated using arterial and mixed-venous blood.
By analysing arterial and expired PCO2, dead-space ventilation can be determined, but extended analyses of V.A/Q.
distribution are not possible in daily practice.
However, knowledge of the principles of typical disturbances of pulmonary gas exchange in acute and chronic lung disease allows the use of therapeutic strategies based on the pathophysiological changes.
Background: Infectious endocarditis can lead to embolic arterial retinal occlusions.
The case of a 30 year old man with acatalasemia is presented.
The congenital disorder  is charaterized by a lack or major reduction of catalase, an enzyme that catalyzes the decomposition of hydrogen peroxide to oxygen and water.
The defect is inherited in an autosomal recessive fashion.
Occasionally the defect manifests as progressive oral gangrene or Takahara's, disease.
Poor longterm success has been reported for penile vein ligation the last few years.
Therefore, we decided to re-investigate our group of 147 patients who were operated on between 1987 and 1996.
All patients showed a negative response to intracavernous injection therapy at the time of diagnosis and revealed a maintenance flow > 15 ml/min, as well as a pathological venous flow with pharmacocavernosometry or pharmacocavernosography.
These patients underwent ligation of all superficial dorsal veins and resection of the deep dorsal vein of the penis.
An up-to-date record of the success of the operation was kept either by a renewed clinical visit or by a standardized telephone interview or questionnaire.
A total of 126 patients were available here for long-term follow-up.
We divided the findings into three groups: complete spontaneous erection, postoperative response to cavernous auto-injection therapy and no changes in erectile competency postoperatively.
The short-term success rate for these groups after 1-3 months was an outcome of 31 (24.6 %), 25 (19.8 %) and 70 (55.6 %) patients; 86 % of the cases whose results deteriorated after the initial operation success rate had this happen within the first postoperative year (p K 0.001).
Favorable prognostic factors were preoperative erectile dysfunction of K 7 years, a normal CC-EMG and a maintenance flow of K 45 ml/min.
If all three parameters were present, the long-term success rate (spontaneous erection plus response to intracavernous injection) of 30 % of all patients was found to rise to 67 % in this selected group of patients (p K 0.001).
This study reveals that long-term success for unselected patients undergoing penile venous surgery is disappointing; however, careful selection of patients by certain prognostic factors can improve long-term results.
Pyoderma gangraenosum can cause great therapeutic problems.
High dosed corticosteroids are the treatment of choice.
However, recalcitrant pyoderma gangraenosum or side effects from corticosteroid treatment may require therapeutic alternatives.
Pyoderma gangraenosum responds excellently to treatment with cyclosporine A.
Because of side effects and drug interactions, the patients must be selected and carefully and closely monitored.
Six patients with pyoderma gangraenosum, unresponsive to various topical and systemic therapies, were treated with oral cyclosporine A at mean daily doses of approximately 3 mg/kg.
Marked improvement of the skin lesions and complete healing occurred in all patients over a period of 3-6 months.
Only one patient suffered a relapse after discontinuation of the treatment.
No severe irreversible side effects occurred.
The results show that low-dose cyclosporine A treatment can be considered a first-line treatment of pyoderma gangraenosum.
Medical treatment of injured patients by international missions of non-governmental organisations in crisis areas and out-of-area operations by troops, and also national disasters require special trauma management.
Deviations from peacetime surgical guidelines are obligatory because of long-distance medical evacuation, the possibility of gaps in supply and the typical pattern of war injuries.
Massive contamination combined with the high risk of infection is one typical attribute of wounds inflicted during a war or a disaster.
In contrast to peacetime surgical guidelines, aggressive wound débridement is often needed.
Timely and prophylactically prescription of a broad-spectrum antibiotic with a long half-life has great importance in the treatment of these wounds.
Suitable antibiotics for these indications are: piperacillin/tazobactam and ceftriazon.
Nevertheless the use of antimicrobial agents will only be effective with early surgical débridement.
Craniofacial development may be potentially implicated after vault corrections in cases of craniosynostosis.
The aim of this prospective study was the investigation of the surgical effect on calvaria growth, correlating the percentiles of a group of patients before and after craniosynostosis correction in relation to the normal percentiles of growth.
The patient population consisted of 71 children; the postoperative follow-up time in 57 patients was more than 12 months.
Of the children followed up, 36 were male and 21 female.
Thirty-six cases involved untreated non-syndromic craniosynostosis; the remaining 21 were syndrome cases.
The patient ages ranged from 16 to 27 months.
In 11 cases correction of an occipital craniosynostosis was carried out.
The fronto-occipital circumference was registered in accordance with Prader's percentile table.
The operative method included a fronto-parietal craniotomy, the temporary removal and shaping of the fronto-orbital band and a vault cranioplasty.
During follow-up 13 patients treated with fronto-orbital advancement in cases of isolated craniosynostosis remained in the registered percentile curve.
In 13 patients a change to a lower percentile curve was confirmed; 1 patient changed to a higher curve.
In cases of syndromic craniosynostosis 10 patients remained in the post-operatively registered percentile curve; 8 patients changed to a lower and 1 patient to a higher percentile curve.
No growth restriction of the reshaped calvaria after surgical correction of craniosynostosis was observed.
No significant difference was found in the potential calvaria growth between syndromic and isolated craniosynostosis.
Today a large number of operative procedures on retroperitoneal organs can be performed using minimally invasive techniques.
The retroperitoneal space can be reached laparoscopically through the peritoneal cavity or by the direct retroperitoneoscopic approach.
The correct anatomical placement of the first trocar is of particular importance in procedures with the patient in lateral decubitus position in order to avoid injuries.
The overview is worse than in conventional surgery because of the magnifying effect of the laparoscope, which is, furthermore, positioned very close to the operative field.
It is therefore of great importance for the surgeon to use anatomical structures for orientation.
The decisive anatomical aspects and landmarks in different minimally invasive operations on retroperitoneal organs are outlined.
Lipid peroxidation is considered a prominent feature of age-related retinal degeneration.
It is known that lipid peroxides can oxidize benzidine.
This property was used to localize lipid peroxides ultrastructurally in the retina.
In a 73 year-old male patient with generalized atherosclerosis, known infrarenal abdominal aortic aneurysm, renal artery stenosis, and coronary artery disease, an aneurysm of the proximal left subclavian artery was successfully excluded by implantation of a JOSTENTTM-Peripheral stent graft.
Angiographic follow up after 6 and 12 months showed an excellent outcome with complete exclusion of the aneurysm.
Intravascular ultrasound showed no neo-intimal hyperplasia within the stent.
A computed tomography revealed complete thrombosis of the aneurysm.
Based upon our increasing knowledge of mechanisms underlying tissue destruction in RA patients, new therapeutic principles have been developed, aimed at blocking proinflammatory cytokines or using antiinflammatory cytokines.
Both principles, however, have proven to be very effective.
In addition, the availability of the methodology to transduce cells with genes has initiated first experiments in animal models to test whether gene therapy for arthritis is suitable, followed by a first, very carefully formulated protocol for human RA.
Gene therapy for RA has to still be considered as an experimental form of therapy in a very early stage, not allowing even now any serious treatment offer to RA patients.
Several problems, such as the question of a suitable vector system have not yet been solved.
With more experiments this therapeutic principle might become available and might prove effective even in a disease with a systemic character like RA in the coming years.
In the case of typical whiplash after low- energy rear-end collision we recommend a clear and structured therapeutic regimen to overcome and prevent neuromuscular deficits.
Patients with bony and discoligamentous lesions have to be excluded, as well as patients with distinct neurologic deficits.
A therapeutic rationale is the basis of full neuromuscular recovery ad integrum.
The news of success in ether anesthesia on 16 October 1846 in Boston spread like wildfire through Europe.
In the German-speaking countries, the national newspapers as conveyers of the development played a prominent role; this was especially the case for the Augsburger Allgemeine Zeitung whose correspondent, Aloys Martin [1], was a medical professional.
The function of local newspapers has not yet been investigated.
This was to be remedied by examining both of Bamberg's local papers.
All issues from 01.01. to 31.04.1847 were surveyed with respect to relevant announcements.
These were then catalogued according to date, extent and contents.
Starting on 22.01.1847, the events outside of and in Bamberg were reported on in 26 notices and articles of just a few lines to half a page and in advertisements; Aloys Martin also appears on the scene.
Thus, the local press in Bamberg also informed its readers early and regularly on the discovery of ether and the succeeding events.
True arterial aneurysms of the infrapopliteal vessels are a rare finding.
During surgical treatment of convergent aneurysms of the popliteal artery and the tibiofibular trunk we discovered a complete spontaneous rupture of the thrombotic aneurysm of the right tibiofibular trunk.
We describe the special features of diagnosis, histology, and the surgical treatment of aneurysms of the crural arteries.
We recommend that even asymptomatic aneurysms be electively operated on to prevent further complications.
Dementia is going to be one of the major challenges of the next century for our societies due to the enormous burden on the health care systems.
Dementia is the major cause of death and the most important risk factor for disability and entry into a nursing home in elderly people.
Moreover, because of the progress in the treatment of Alzheimer's disease, in particular with the cholinesterase inhibitors, demented people will be more often and detected earlier by general practitioners and families.
Nowadays operative sperm retrieval in connection with assisted reproduction is a well-established procedure in urological-gynecological cooperative groups.
Microsurgical epididymal sperm aspiration (MESA) and testicular sperm extraction (TESE) are the fundamental procedures in cases of non-reconstructable obstructive azoospermia or testicular azoospermia.
As they are often favored percutaneous techniques such as percutaneous epididymal sperm aspiration (PESA) or percutaneous testicular sperm extraction (PTESE), need to be in Anglo-American countries and the countries of northern Europe, discussed regarding their efficacy (number of retrieved spermatozoa) and possible testicular injury due to blind or ultrasound-guided puncture.
In Middle Franconia, one of the larger Bavarian administrative division (population 1994: 1,657,101), the number of patients suffering from cancer pain, chronic headache and chronic back pain is not known.
Furthermore, there are no data on interdisciplinary organization of outpatient pain management.
A 34-year-old HIV-infected African woman developed fever, weight loss and widespread papules on her trunk, arms and face.
Skin biopsy and culture revealed histoplasmosis caused by Histoplasma capsulatum varietas capsulatum (American histoplasmosis).
Even though antimycotic treatment and intensive care were started immediately the patient died because of the systemic mycosis within a few days.
Histoplasmosis is a rare disease in Europe but endemic in some areas of the USA (e.g.
Ohio, Mississippi) and of Africa.
Additionally histoplasma capsulatum varietas duboisii is endemic in Central and South Africa.
As a consequence of scientific advances, an increasing number of patients with advanced age, reduced myocardial performance, previous cardiac surgery, comorbidities, and emergency indications are referred for cardiac surgery.
This requires risk stratification to predict "low", "moderate", and "high" operative risk.
Risk factors can be divided into pre-, intra-, and postoperative patient-, structure-, and procedure-related.
On the basis of this risk prediction, the perioperative course can be optimized by an individually tailored multiprofessional and interdisciplinary management.
Unnoticed, minor damage to the unidirectional respiratory valves of the Draeger respiratory circuit may lead to intermittent and unpredictable malfunction, resulting in rebreathing and hypercapnia.
The damage may be so minor that normal visual and functional test routines may be insufficient to detect it.
We report one case of a potential life-threatening malfunction of the inspiratory valve and also propose economical solutions utilizing altered construction, modified machine-check procedures, or a simple instrument that adds only one step to the machine-check procedure.
The general problem of minor but functionally important damage to parts of ventilatory equipment - so-called borderline damage - may not be limited to this particular model or manufacturer.
Most users of ventilatory equipment believe that equipment that goes through normal check procedures is either fully functional or non-functional.
In reality, this is not the case.
Intermittent malfunctions due to slightly damaged equipment may be missed with normal machine-check procedures.
This problem results in a significant but incalculable increased in risk to patients.
Because of unclear reproduceability of intermittent malfunctions caused by borderline damage, there also is an increased forensic risk for the anaesthesiologist.
The risk of mechanical malfunction might be displaced by software problems in new-generation ventilators in the market.
Purpose: To investigate whether the margins of microscopic tumors can be delineated better with monocrystalline iron oxide nanoparticles (MION), a superparamagnetic contrast medium, than with Gd-DTPA by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).
Nonunion of the ankle malleoli is extremely rare these days.
This is probably due to the fact that primary osteosynthesis is performed in ankle fractures instead of the conservative treatment given up to 20 years ago.
Today nonunions of the malleoli are seen, if at all, is infected cases after surgical procedures.
Noninfected, stable and painless nonunions usually do not need any surgical correction.
In painful cases, small fragments, especially of the medial malleolus, should be resected; larger fragments should be stabilized with two 3.5-mm cancellous screws.
Alternatively, the tension banding technique, especially after Weber A fracture, produces high compression in the area of nonunion.
In cases of additional bony defects, a local upside down cortical-cancellous bone graft should be performed in addition.
In summary, the therapeutic approach requires exact remodeling, bone-grafting and stabilization.
Infected nonunions with loss of bone mass should be treated according to the guidelines for osteitis therapy.
This study investigated the influence of the patients' educational level on indication for and duration of psychotherapy and the choice of treatment methods (psychodynamically oriented psychotherapy or psychoanalysis).
We considered treatments that were conducted within the framework of the statutory health insurance in Germany.
Data were collected from the therapists' case history (n=274), submitted to the first author as an expert of the statutory health insurance companies.
We found a significant relationship between level of education and indication for psychotherapy.
In our sample 43.5% had graduated from senior high school compared with 25.1% in the average German population.
This relationship is getting more clear if we discriminate between psychodynamically oriented psychotherapy and psychoanalysis.
51.7% of the patients undergoing psychoanalysis had graduated from senior high school and only 13.2% from junior high school compared with 48.7% in the average German population.
Also the duration of psychotherapy depends only on the level of education, not on gender, age or type of statutory health insurance.
These results are discussed carefully and questions for further investigations are deduced.
After the initial enthusiasm subsided lasercoagulation of the prostate has been criticized because the extent of tissue destruction cannot be controlled and many patients may be expected to have significant postoperative obstructive as well as irritative voiding symptoms which may last for weeks.
Thanks to new laservaporization techniques these disadvantages have been largely eliminated.
With the Holmium laser a real resection of prostatic tissue is possible allowing the surgeon to see the prostatectomy defect immediately and to assess tissue destruction during the operation ("what you see is what you get").
The postoperative voiding disturbances are diminished and comparable to those after TUR-P.
The classification of acetabular fractures and especially the diagnosis of additional lesions can be misleading, when the personal experience is limited and the decisions are based only on conventional radiographs.
The introduction of Spiral-CT with multiplanar reformations and 3-D views has improved the quality of visualization.
Due to their higher costs, the need of these additional diagnostic tools is frequently questioned.
This paper discusses the relevance of plain radiographs, 2-D-CTs, 3-D-CTs and Femursubtraction-CTs (FsCT) for the classification of acetabular fractures, based on a controlled study.
Methods: Thirty physicians with different levels of experience in acetabular surgery were divided in three groups of 10 each: group I comprised residents without operative experience in acetabular surgery, group II was physicians with 3-10 years of operative experience, and group III was experts in acetabular surgery.
A total of 10 complete radiographic cases of high quality providing all levels of preoperative diagnostics (plain radiographs, 2-D-CT, CT with multiplanar reformation, 3-D-CT, Fs-CT) of different acetabular fracture types were prepared.
The task for each candidate was to classify the fracture according to Letournel and to identify all additional injuries within the hip joint (e. g. marginal impaction, head fractures, etc.).
The different diagnostic "levels" could be ordered stepwise according to personal need and no time limit was given.
The case was finished when the candidate presented his final diagnosis.
The use of the different radiographs, the preliminary diagnosis, the changes in diagnosis, and the final decisions were recorded.
These findings were correlated with the different levels of experience and against a "consensus classification" which was generated by thorough discussion, and the use of intraoperative information and postoperative radiographs not accessible to the candidates.
Results: The "correct" fracture classification based on plain radiographs was: group I, 11 %; group II, 32 %; group III, 61 %.
Based on 2-D-CT a "correct" diagnosis was reached by 30 % in group I, by 55 % in group II, and by 76 % in group III.
With consideration of the "transient forms" in acetabular fractures based on Letournel and the 3-D-CT used mainly by group I, the rate of "correct" classifications rose to 65 % in group I, 64 % in group II and 83 % in group III.
The modifiers were diagnosed "correctly" in group I by 37 %, in group II by 56 %, and in group III by 73 %.
The use of the 3-D-CT and especially the Fs-CT by group I resulted in an improvement in the rate of correct classifications to 61 %, whereas in group II the Fs-Ct was used only exceptionally.
The 2-D-CT was the basis for the diagnosis of the additional lesions in acetabular fractures within all groups resulting in 73 % complete diagnoses in group III.
This study showed the importance of CT for the exact analysis and classification of acetabular fractures.
In particular, the secondary reformations in CT and the 3-D-views dramatically improved the rate of "correct" classifications in the group of surgeons with limited personal experience in acetabular surgery.
This allows the less experienced an acceptable level of "correct" diagnoses, so that the treatment options can be weighed correctly.
Among the "experts" a rate of divergent classifcations of approximately 20 % was observed, especially in "transient" forms of acetabular fractures.
Background: Iridodonesis is the clinical sign of lens subluxation.
Acute glaucoma caused by a ciliolenticular block may develop.
YAG iridotomy or peripheral iridectomy are rarely effective in controlling intraocular pressure.
The results of phacoemulsification and posterior lens implantation for subluxated lens and glaucoma are reported.
Cerebral perfusion reserve may be determined by assessing changes in cerebral blood flow using vasodilators.
Transcranial Doppler (TCD) may be used to measure cerebral blood flow speed in response to such stimuli.
The aim of this study was to analyze cerebral vasoreactivity in patients with high-grade carotid stenosis and to determine the short- and long-term effects of desobliteration.
A total of 40 patients had bilateral preoperative studies done and 24 were re-evaluated 1 year later.
The preoperative vasomotor capacity using TCD with CO2 was 57% +/- 45.
Hemodynamic reserve did not decrease significantly in the early postoperative period on the operated hemisphere, and 1 year later hemodynamic reserve had increased to to 102% +/- 80%.
One year later patients with unilateral stenosis (n=11) presented with a restitution of reactivity to 65% +/- 46% after initial postoperative ipsilateral decrease from 51% +/- 35% to 48% +/- 38%.
Patients with bilateral stenoses (n=9) demonstrated an initial decrease from 70% +/- 60% to 48% +/- 21% and a significant rise to 115% +/- 77% 1 year later (P=0.02).
Both the significant postoperative increase in the cerebral vasomotor capacity in patients with bilateral carotid stenoses registered in both hemispheres and long-term improvement in patients with unilateral stenosis underline the effectivity of carotid desobliteration in antiembolic prophylaxis and in cerebral blood flow increase, irrespective of the symptomatology.
Chronic constipation can be divided in two large groups: slow-transit constipation, caused by pathological intestinal transit, and obstructive defecation disorder, caused by pelvic and rectal wall abnormalities.
Videodefecography and defecoflowmetry are methods used to study dynamic evacuation of the rectum.
Videodefecography also enables visual estimation of rectal evacuation.
Defecoflowmetry allows analysis of anal and rectal pressures.
Within this prospective study we utilized and compared these methods in 19 patients with slow transit and 30 patients with obstructive disease.
In patients with slow transit, both investigations demonstrated a significantly higher defecation rate than in obstructive defecation disorder (slow transit: defecoflowmetry 65 %, videodefecography 80 %; obstructive defecation disorder: 50 % and 58 %).
The evacuation time was pathologically prolonged in both types of constipation, with a range of 43-55 s. Rectoceles are demonstrated in 94 % of cases with slow transit and in 72 % with obstructive defecation disorder.
Also, we often found obstructive components in slow-transit constipation patients.
Normal defecography or defecoflowmetry can rule out obstructive defecation disorder.
We conclude that videodefecography and defecoflowmetry are important items in the complex diagnostic regimen needed in evaluation of chronic constipation.
Absence of the septum pellucidum is a rare developmental disorder of the human brain.
Previous reports focused on the association with other cerebral anomalies.
We present MRI scans showing an isolated absence of the septum pellucidum.
The patient was suffering from a schizophrenic psychosis.
Mental retardation or epileptic seizures, which are often found in more complex developmental brain disorders, were not observed.
The septal area is part of the limbic system and aplasia of the septum pellucidum could indicate developmental anomalies of the limbic system.
The concept of cerebral maldevelopment and the limbic system in schizophrenic psychosis is discussed.
History and clinical findings: A 61 year old man presented with newly developed tachyarrhythmia.
Echocardiographically a tumour of unclear origin in the left atrium was diagnosed.
Investigations: The heart rate in the ECG was arrhythmic at 146/min; intermittently sinus rhythm was established.
Transoesophageal echocardiography revealed a 90x50 mm tumour with sharp borders displacing both atria.
The chest x-ray showed a mediastinal rounded mass in the dorsal part overlapping the right mediastinal border.
Computer tomography was unable to discriminate the atrial wall from the tumour masses; hence the difference between an (intra-)cardiac tumour (i.e.
myxoma) and a tumour of extracardiac (mediastinal) origin could not be established.
Additional magnetic resonance tomography led to the most probable diagnosis of a bronchogenic cyst, which spread ventrally up to the ascending aorta and dorsally to the paravertebral region, thus displacing and shrinking the left pulmonary artery and the left atrium.
Therapy: For certain exclusion of malignancy and because of displacement of other thoracic structures the patient was operated on this mediastinal mass by anterolateral thoracotomy.
Histologically a dysontogenetic, benign cyst with an inner layer of mesothel and nerval as well as vascular structures in the capsule was diagnosed.
Since the operation the patient has persistent sinus rhythm without symptoms of relevant rhythm disorders.
An overview of different kinds of intrathoracical cysts is given.
Longstanding and untreated scaphoid fractures and scapholunate dissociations lead to painful destruction of the wrist with carpal collapse.
The severity of degenerative arthrosis is classified in three stages and can be treated adaequate operatively.
SNAC wrist (scaphoid nonunion advanced collapse) after failed fusion of the scaphoid and SLAC wrist (scapholunate advanced collapse) after scapholunate dissociation should be differentiated.
The reconstruction of the scaphoid or scapholunate ligament in stage II and III is no reasonable option.
Motion preserving procedures such as proximal row carpectomy or midcarpal arthrodesis are preferable in this situation.
Thirty-one male patients (average 41 years) were treated for SNAC or SLAC wrist with midcarpal arthrodesis.
All patients were reexamined, the mean follow-up was 15 months.
Grip strength was measured with the Dexter-System, pain was evaluated by a visual analogue scale (VAS 0-100).
Patients' daily activities and general quality of life were estimated with the DASH-questionnaire.
Pain was reduced to 50% compared to the preoperative situation.
Grip strength improved to 60% of the opposite side.
Active range of motion reached 50% of the contralateral wrist.
Nonunion at the fusion site necessitated additional surgery in four patients resulting in total wrist arthrodesis.
80% of the patients returned to their original occupation.
Midcarpal fusion is a reliable procedure for treating the difficult condition of advanced carpal collapse is proper realignement of the carpus is performed.
The DASH-score reflects the subjective impressions of the patients in daily life and justifies the choice of a salvage procedure preserving wrist mobility.
Total wrist fusion represents the last line of defense.
Stress fractures are one of the most common overuse injuries seen in athletes, accounting for up to 20 % of all injuries presented to sports medicine clinics.
Runners are particularly prone to these injuries, however, it is difficult to predict injury as there is usually a critical interplay between the athlete's biomechanical predisposition, training methods, and other factors such as diet, and muscle strength and flexibility.
This article will discuss the key clinical findings for the majority of stress fractures encountered in a sports medicine practice.
A classification scheme will also be described that will allow the clinician to make appropriate treatment decisions based on the degree of risk for each injury.
Today, enzyme therapy with proteolytic enzymes still only plays a minor role in clinical practice, partially due to the belief that intestinal resorption of macromolecules is impossible.
However, there is scientific evidence of intestinal resorption and a subsequent increase in proteolytic serum activity, and placebo-controlled randomised clinical trials have demonstrated positive effects of enzyme therapy.
The documented effects include the reduction of oedema and resorption of haematoma, resulting in pain reduction and better mobility.
There are indications to use such therapies in the areas of general surgery, traumatology, plastic surgery, and dental surgery.
A further effect is higher tissue concentration of antibiotics in combination with proteolytic enzymes.
In gynaecological treatments, enzymes are administered in breast surgery and to reduce the side effects of obstetrical injuries.
Breast engorgement is a further indication for enzyme therapy.
Further studies concerning enzyme therapy are justified because of the interesting possibilities offered by these substances and a favourable relationship between costs and benefits.
High-frequency ventilation and inhaled nitric oxide represent - among others - two treatment options in hypoxemic respiratory failure of neonates.
We report the case of a term infant with meconium aspiration syndrome, who only responded favorably to inhaled nitric oxide following the initiation of high-frequency ventilation.
At an oxygenation index of 17 we started treatment with nitric oxide in order to reverse right-to-left shunting and improve oxygenation.
How- ever the respiratory situation did not improve, the oxygenation index increased to 25.
After discontinuation of nitric oxide the mode of ventilation was switched to HFV with mean airway pressures of 15 mbar.
Again oxyena-tion was unaffected with an oxygenation index of meanwhile 31.
At that stage of a second trial of inhaled nitric oxide was started at a concentration of 10 ppm while continuing high-frequency ventilation.
Immediately oxygenation improved significantly, the oxygenation index decreased to 9 within several minutes after restarting nitric oxide.
This effect on oxygenation was sustained for the duration of several days during high-frequency ventilation until gradual weaning from iNO could be performed.
Learning microsurgery of the middle ear requires preparations of temporal bones.
Ethical and moral restrictions in obtaining specimens make training and research with temporal bone preparations increasingly more difficult.
Due to the complex structure of the temporal bone with its communicating cavities, the manufacture of facsimiles up to now has been impossible.
Rapid prototyping techniques must be able to produce identical objects from an original one.
By using CT scans of temporal bones from anatomic preparations and patients we have been able to reconstruct 3D pictures on a CAD workstation.
We are now able to incorporate data in a stereolithographic system to create an anatomic facsimile of the temporal bone.
It is possible to produce a considerable number of these facsimiles from the same real object.
With this method we can produce models of human structure for medical teaching, training and research.
Our artificial preparations of temporal bones correspond to both the material characteristics and anatomic details of human structures, allowing various surgical exercises to be carried out.
During the past few years the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis, the most frequent of the rheumatic inflammatory systemic diseases has improved a great deal.
The treatment strategy is based on the one hand on the so-called prognostic factors and on the other hand on the extent of the inflammatory activities, especially during the first phase.
Numerous controlled studies and meta-analyses have enabled optimal application of the basic disease-modifying drugs, with regard to efficacy and side effects.
During the first stage of these disease, the immunobiological substances against pro-inflammatory cells are employed.
Improved knowledge of physiotherapeutic treatment, correct diet and careful observation of the patient's progress with the aid of questionnaires enable optimal care with regard to life quality.
Intrinsic positive end-expiratory pressure (PEEPi) occurring during mechanical ventilation depends on expiratory time constants, expiratory volume and expiration time as well as on external flow resistance (tubes, valves, etc.).
It is not routinely determined in mechanically ventilated patients, but it is necessary to optimize respirator settings.
The aim of the present study was the validation of an automated PEEPi determination method implemented in the respirator EVITA (Drägerwerke, Lübeck) in mechanically ventilated patients with acute lung failure.
The method was validated in ten sedated, myorelaxed patients with respiratory insufficiency of different etiologies (five with restrictive, and five with obstructive pulmonary disease).
PEEPi was determined using the volume constant ventilatory mode at ZEEP or at an external PEEP of 5 as well as 10 cm H2O.
PEEPi was first determined with the automated method implemented in the EVITA (five measurements at each end-expiratory pressure level; PEEPEvita).
Steady-state was attained between each measurement.
These values were compared to the results obtained with end-expiratory occlusion (external, computer-controlled valve in the inspiratory limb of the circuit) at the respective pressure levels (PEEPEEO).
The average of five measurements at each PEEP level with each method was defined as PEEPi for the particular ventilatory situation.
Gas flow was measured at the proximal end of the endotracheal tube with a heated pneumotachometer (Fleisch no.
2, Fleisch, Lausanne, Switzerland) and a differential pressure transducer.
Tracheal pressure was determined in the same position with a further differential pressure transducer (Dr. Fenyves & Gut, Basel, Switzerland).
After A/D conversion, data were sampled with a frequency of 20 Hz and processed on an IBM compatible PC.
Software for data collection and processing as well as for control of the occlusion valve was self-programmed.
For the statistical analysis we used the Mann-Whitney U-test or Wilcoxon signed-ranks test; a P value less than 0.05 was considered significant.
At the given respiratory setting and without PEEP patients with obstructive lung disease had a higher PEEPi (median: 6.4 cm H2O; range: 5.0 - 9.6 cm H2O) than those with restrictive pulmonary disease (median: 2.3 cm H2O; range: 0.8 - 3.0 cm H2O) (P<0.05).
Increasing external PEEP to 5 or 10 cm H2O significantly decreased the pressure difference between PEEPi and external PEEP (P<0.05), but was unable to eliminate it completely.
There was no statistically significant difference between PEEPEEO and PEEPEvita (P=0.43; Wilcoxon signed-ranks tests).
Regression analysis showed a highly significant correlation between PEEPEEO and PEEPEvita values (r=0.985, P<0.001; y=1.03x-0.18).
PEEPi occurs during ventilation in patients with obstructive and restrictive lung disease.
The difference between external end-expiratory pressure and PEEPi decreases with increasing external PEEP.
However, PEEPi may increase with increasing external PEEP in some instances.
The reason for this may be that the PEEPi determined at the proximal end of the endotracheal tube represents only a mean value of different PEEPi values of various lung regions.
Increasing external PEEP only partially alters this mean value due to an effect on PEEPi values lower than external PEEP.
The PEEPi values measured by the EVITA respirator compared with classical end-expiratory occlusion with an external valve were nearly identical.
Unfortunately, PEEPi measurement of the EVITA can only
We report on the case of a 70-year-old caucasian woman with a large linear sebaceous naevus with multifocal intralesional basaliomas and a lipodermoid of the left eye.
This rare finding has been preserved because of the special history of the patient.
The naevus spread on the left side from parietal to retroauricular, nuchal and sternal.
Because of the patient's cardio-pulmonary insufficiency we excised the basaliomas under local anaesthesia.
We also made a partial stripped excision of the left-sided parietal parts of the naevus.
We describe an HLA-B27 positive patient in whom posttraumatic pyogenic sacroilitis led to complete unilateral sacroiliac joint ankylosis in the absence of any signs indicative of HLA-B27 associated spondyloarthropathy.
Ondansetron, a selective 5-HT3 receptor antagonist, has recently been shown, in a dose of 8 mg, to be superior to 1.25 mg droperidol in preventing postoperative vomiting.
There are indications that a dose of 4 mg of ondansetron may be just as effective in reducing postoperative nausea and vomiting as a dose of 8 mg [16].
The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy and the adverse effects of 4 mg ondansetron in the prevention of postoperative nausea and vomiting compared to droperidol in patients undergoing surgery with inhalation anaesthesia supplemented with alfentanil.
Following institutional approval, 40 ASA physical status I and II women scheduled for minor gynaecological surgery gave informed consent to participate in this randomized, double-blind comparative study.
Five minutes before induction of general anaesthesia, 20 patients received a single intravenous (IV) dose of 4 mg of ondansetron and the remaining 20 received 1.25 mg droperidol IV.
Anaesthesia was induced with 2.1 - 4 mg/kg of thiopental and 0.1 mg of alfentanil IV and maintained with 65% nitrous oxide and 1.5% - 3% enflurane in oxygen.
On pain stimuli another 0.2 - 0.4 mg of alfentanil was given.
Total effective antiemetic response was defined as the absence of nausea and vomiting for 24 h postoperatively.
The incidence of nausea, vomiting and the number of patients showing total antiemetic response as well as the incidence of adverse effects were compared with the chi2 test and P<0.05 was considered significant.
Patients were similar with respect to age, height, body weight and total anaesthetic agents received.
Duration of anaesthesia and the time until awakening was not significantly different among groups.
Postoperatively 7 out of 20 patients given 4 mg of ondansetron and 3 out of 20 patients with droperidol vomited (n.s.).
The incidence of nausea was 11 out of 20 in the ondansetron group, and 4 out of 20 in the droperidol group (P<0.05).
Sixteen patients in the droperidol group and 8 patients in the ondansetron group showed a total effective antiemetic response (P<0.05).
Postoperative sedation and well-being scores did not differ significantly among groups.
Our results show that for the prevention of postoperative nausea and vomiting 4 mg of ondansetron was inferior to 1.25 mg of droperidol.
The drugs were given intravenously prior to general anaesthesia for minor gynaecological surgery with nitrous oxide and enflurane in oxygen supplemented with small boluses of alfentanil.
A 66-year-old woman died of internal bleeding and pulmonary fat embolism following repeated massive blows from a wickerwork carpetbeater and an electric cable.
The initial autopsy diagnosis was natural death.
A second autospy on the exhumed body and an intensive criminal investigation revealed a long history of maltreatment by two sisters with whom the victim lived.
The maltreatment occurred during exorcisms with the purported purpose of ridding the victim of her possession by Satan.
The perpetrators and the victim belonged to the same pseudoreligous sect.
The elder of the two sisters had been previously convicted of a fatal exorcism maltreatment of a 17-year-old girl.
Definition of the problem: The article discusses the ways in which sociological analyses can contribute to the problem of a just allocation of scarce donor organs.
Since 1993, 30 patients with acute distal intraarticular radius fractures have been treated under arthroscopic assistance.
According to the AO classification there were 3 B- and 27 C-fractures, most of them Frykman VIII fractures.
Of 30 fractures 23 showed additional lesions which could only be diagnosed under arthroscopic view.
In particular, 12 partial or complete tears of the intracarpal ligaments were found.
Of 25 fractures 23 which were treated at least 12 months previously could be followed up radiologically and clinically.
X-rays included postero anterior and lateral views to evaluate the radial angles and the radial length and stress tests to check for instability, especially of the scapholunate ligaments.
Clinical examination included range of motion and objective grip strength measured with a Jamar (Cedaron) tester.
Each test was performed on both wrists for comparison.
Subjective data included pain and function for daily activities.
Data were evaluated by the Jakim and the Cooney scoring system and the demerit point system by Gartland and Werley as modified by Sarmiento et al.
About 70% of our patients showed an excellent or good result; about 15% had a poor result.
However, we must mention that we were not able to reduce one C3-fracture under arthroscopic view and had to switch to a semi-open procedure with additional external fixateurs.
Arthroscopically assisted treatment of distal intraarticular fractures is not only useful to detect and manage additional carpal lesions, but seems to give good midterm results as well.
Antitachycardia pacing techniques (ATP) have proved useful for termination of ventricular tachycardia (VT).
However, little is known about the efficacy and safety off ATP during long-term follow-up in a larger study population.
We analyzed the data of 80 ICD patients (pts) with spontaneous monormorphic VT, mean age 59  +/-  12 years, the mean follow-up was 26  +/-  17 months.
50 pts (62.5%) had coronary artery disease, 18 (22.5%) dilative cardiomyopathy (DCM), the remaining 12 pts (15%) had no or other cardiac diseases.
2926 episodes of ventricular tachycardia (cycle length 349  +/-  51 ms, 240-520 ms) occurred in 64/80 pts (80%), overall efficacy of ATP was 89.9%, acceleration occurred in 4.1% of VTs.
Success of ATP did not correlate with positive ATP testing on induced arrhythmias, LVEF, NYHA class or aneurysm.
Neither underlying heart disease nor antiarrhythmic medication had an impact on the ATP success rate.
ATP efficacy was linked significantly to short VT cycle length (VTCL, 240-300 ms, p < 0.01) and long coupling intervals (91-97%), p < 0.01).
Acceleration occurred in 32% of pts and in 4.1% of VT episodes; it was also dependent on short VT cycle length (< 300 ms vs > 300 ms, p < 0.04) and short coupling intervals (< 81% vs >= 81%, p <= 0.01).
Methodological work was performed in the field of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and spectroscopy (MRS) in order to develop suitable tools for non-invasive characterization of hematopoetic bone marrow.
The methods were applied for the assessment of normal values in healthy persons and to examine patients with generalized hematological diseases or to monitor effects of therapies influencing the composition of bone marrow.
Lichen ruber planus is considered a T-cell mediated immunologic reaction with unclear pathogenesis.
Drugs and infections (especially hepatitis B and C) are well-known provocation factors.
After an infection with scabies a 13 year old boy developed a generalized lichen planus including bullous lesions.
For the first time scabies is presented as a trigger for lichen planus.
In childhood, lichen planus is characterized by atypical clinical features and sometimes a severe course.
Introduction: Increasing demands on quality assurance und medical performance documentation require an immedate and evaluable documentation in the outpatients' department.
Presentation of a new computer-based diagnostic system for reporting and medical performance documentation.
Methods: Development and initial application of the system in three big orthopeadical or traumatological hospitals.
Judegements about the feasibility of immediate documentation in outpatients' departments.
Results: Presentation of an outpatients' departments diagnostic system with textblock-oriented anamnesis or anatomy-related diagnosis through pre-structured examination checklists.
Coding of ICD-9/-10 as well as AO-classification and AIS (abbreviated injury scale).
Medical performance documentation through forms including pre-defined billing codes.
Presentation of the documentation flow and its transfer into other contexts.
Discussion: Pure text-based clinical results do not allow sufficient evalutation for quality assurance and medical performance documentation.
However, a computer-based and immediate documentation in outpatients' departments should not mean a significantly increased workload for physicians.
Hydromorphone is a µ receptor agonist opioid.
According to WHO recommendations, hydromorphone is to be classified in step III of pain therapy.
An oral formulation with a prolonged duration of action of 12 hours has been evaluated only recently.
The controlled release capsule is especially suited for the regular twice a day administration in cases of severe and persistent pain.
The oral formulation of hydromorphone increases the number of opioid analgesics available for pain therapy in step III.
Hydromorphone is recommended when morphine fails to produce sufficient pain relief (despite increase of doses) or causes intolerable side effects (despite treatment of symptoms).
In principle, no differences in efficacy of morphine and hydromorphone are to be expected.
However, clinical experience shows that changing one opioid analgesic to another one can improve the treatment of patients so that hydromorphone may replace another opioid analgesic to which a patient fails to respond well or develops side effects.
The dose of hydromorphone equivalent to 2 times 30 mg controlled release morphine is about 2 times 4 mg.
The values for the absorption, bioavailability and maximum plasma concentration after the administration of controlled release hydromorphone every 12 hours -of three times the dose- are equivalent to those of an immediate release tablet given every 4 hours.
In several open label and controlled studies, hydromorphone proved to be of good efficacy in the treatment of acute and persistent pain, especially in patients with severe cancer pain.
With regard to the incidence of side effects, no significant differences between morphine and hydromorphone could be established.
In general, the side effects of hydromorphone are typical for opioid analgesics.
In 63 patients, 82 elevations of the maxillary sinus were performed.
As augmentation, materials autografts from the iliac crest (combined with alveolar ridge augmentations in 16 sinus lifts) were transplanted in 39 cases and osteoinductive, allogeneic bone powder (AAA bone (autolyzed, antigen-extracted, allogeneic bone): n = 8, DFDBA (demineralized freeze-dried bone allograft) and/or GraftonTM (demineralized bone matrix gel): n = 35) were used in 43 cases.
Some 4-6 months after implantation, osteoinductive, allogeneic (demineralized) bone implants showed radio-opaque areas as an equivalent of bone formation.
Histological examinations revealed that osteoinductive implants were completely transformed into patients' own bone tissue.
The average augmentation height after autograft transplantations was 14 ( +/-  3) mm in comparison with 9 ( +/-  3) mm after allograft implantations.
Histologically as well as radiologically no differences of the bone quality could be determined between the two augmentation materials.
Endoscopic controls showed, in both groups, nonirritated mucous membranes.
On an average 2 endosseous implants (Bone LockR or ITIR-screw implants) were inserted into the augmentated maxillary sinus floors in both groups.
No osseointegration was achieved in 4 out of 67 dental implants when bone autografts were used and in 2 out of 74 dental implants of the allogeneic bone group.
Patients with bone autografts suffered from postoperative complaints on an average of 19 ( +/-  9) days (without consideration of 2 patients with postoperative complaints persisting for more than 90 days).
The average postoperative complaints of recipients of allogeneic bone implants continued for 3 ( +/-  5) days.
The 13 patients who underwent an ambulant sinus lift procedure with allogeneic bone powder were already symptom-free several hours after the operation.
Under critical consideration of all investigated parameters, osteoinductive bone implants are preferable to iliac bone autografts for maxillary sinus augmentations in those cases in which no additional alveolar ridge augmentation is required.
We describe a patient with a primary renal plasmacytoma.
In the literature available, only six clinical cases have been reported.
A 64-year-old patient is presented who had the clinical signs of a renal cell carcinoma.
Histological examination after nephrectomy, however, revealed a plasmacytoma.
Based on this case, we discuss how one should proceed in this disease.
Primary renal plasmacytoma can be tentatively diagnosed preoperatively only in the presence of paraproteinemia or Bence-Jones proteinuria, as it cannot be distinguished from other renal tumors by imaging procedures.
Postoperatively, further staging procedures must rule out bone involvement (solitary myeloma or multiple myeloma).
Nephrectomy is required in patients with plasmacytoma only if renal complications occur.
Dissection of the ascending aorta (type A) following later after aortic valve replacement has been described with increasing frequency.
This study analyzes the role of aortic valve replacement for the evolution of late dissection.
Between December 1986 and November 1995, 222 patients with 225 acetabular fractures were treated operatively by three surgeons in the Department of Traumatology and Emergency Surgery of the University Hospitals of the Catholic University of Leuven.
Indications for surgery were unstable fracture, displaced fracture through the acetabular dome and fracture with intra-acetabular fracture fragments.
There were 37.3% A-fractures, 49.7% B-fractures, and 13% C fractures according to the AO Classification.
In 16.4% of fractures there were primary neurological deficits.
Patients were treated operatively after an average of 5.0 days.
The Kocher-Langenbeck approach was used in 56.9% of cases, the ilio-inguinal approach in 27.1% and the extended iliofemoral approach in 4%.
In 7.1% of patients, a primary total hip endoprosthesis was implanted.
There was no intra- oder perioperative mortality.
The average hospital stay was 26.1 days.
In 7.1% of patients, we noted secondary neurological problems.
Deep infections were present in 1.3%.
In 11.1% of patients a second operative procedure was necessary.
We were able to review 175 patients after an average of 2 years.
Signs of arthrosis and periarticular ossification were noted on the x-rays: walking distance, hip mobility and pain intensity were asked about and recorded after the clinical examination.
In 76% of patients an excellent or good result on the Merle-d'Aubigne scale was obtained.
T-fractures and posterior wall fractures were followed by the worst results.
During this 9-year period, changes have been made to the preoperative radiological examination carried out, the choice of operative approach and our policy on prevention of thrombosis prophylaxis and postoperative ossification.
After thorough preoperative diagnosis and with a meticulous operative technique, it is possible to stabilise the vast majority of acetabular fractures through the three classical approaches.
Because the fractures are relatively rare, their diagnosis complex and their surgical treatment difficult, specific training is essential for every acetabular surgeon.
Diagnostic pitfalls exist when benign salivary gland diseases are mistakenly classified as malignant, with consequences for treatment and prognosis.
Examples are necrotizing sialometaplasia, metaplastic Warthin tumour and sclerosing polycystic sialadenopathy.
The proper diagnosis is of eminent importance to distinguish cases of primary tumours that have developed in salivary glands or their lymph nodes from cases of extraglandular tumours with metastases in these glands or their nodes.
In these cases clinical data and additional immunocytochemical methods are necessary to clarify the exact diagnosis, especially when the primary salivary gland tumours have a structure largely identical to the metastases (e.g.
Nasopharyngeal or cervical chordomas can be mistaken for pleomorphic adenoma or mucinous adenocarcinoma.
The initial stage of malignant MALT lymphomas in association with Sjögren's syndrome demands identification of clonal rearrangement for therapeutic implication.
The diagnostic criteria for proper classification are analysed in detail.
A 59-year-old male patient was transnasally operated on because of a pituitary adenoma with hypopituitarism.
A second operation and X-ray therapy followed a half year later due to recurrent tumor.
Both neoplasmas were classified as sparsely granulated prolactin cell adenomas.
Immunohistochemical studies revealed strong immunoreactivity for prolactin and FSH in the tumor cells of both the pituitary adenoma and the recurrent tumor.
Two years later the prolactin plasma levels were extremely elevated.
A tumor in the liver was identified.
Biopsy revealed a solid endocrine tumor containing prolactin by immunohistology.
Due to structural and immunohistological similarities this tumor could be identified as a metastasis of the pituitary tumor.
After 5 months of therapy the patient died from thrombembolism.
Post-mortem studies confirmed the diagnosis of a metastasizing prolactin-secreting pituitary carcinoma.
Only six similar cases have been reported in the literature.
Our case report confirms the experience with 35 definite pituitary carcinomas reparted in the current literature: malignant pituitary tumors develop after pituitary surgery and can be identified not from the pituitary tumor, but only from its metastases.
Paraneoplastic markers in tumor patients may occur at various stages of the disease.
While some disorders almost invariably herald an underlying malignancy (obligative marker), most only occasionally do so (facultative marker).
The association of bullous pemphigoid with malignancy is controversial.
There are only a few reports of bullous pemphigoid associated with a renal cell carcinoma.
We diagnosed a renal cell carcinoma in a 74 year old female patient, admitted to the hospital because of bullous pemphigoid.
Multiple metastases were found in her lymph nodes, liver, lung and skeleton.
The patient died eleven weeks after the first symptoms of bullous pemphigoid appeared.
Acute compartment syndrome of the thigh has been infrequently reported in the literature.
Closed femoral fractures and blunt soft tissue trauma are the main causes of this injury.
The multiple injured patient in this case report developed a compartment syndrome of the thigh after intramedullary nailing of a comminuted fracture of the femur.
Fasciotomy was performed two days after surgery because of extense swelling of the thigh in the ventilated and sedated patient.
Sciatic and femoral nerve palsy was recognized after extubation of the patient nine days after the injury.
During the following weeks the paresis of the femoral nerve recovered but neither motor nor sensory function of the sciatic nerve could be demonstrated.
Therefore an operative revision of the sciatic nerve was performed eighteen weeks after trauma.
No direct nerve injury could be detected but there were adhesions around the nerve as a sign of compression neuropathy caused by the compartment syndrome.
The tibial component of the sciatic nerve showed a complete recovery within the next months but there was a persisting peroneal nerve palsy.
Conclusion: Early clinical symptoms of a compartment syndrome like pain, paresthesia and paresis can not be ascertained in a ventilated and sedated patient.
Tense swelling of the muscles is often the only detectable sign.
Frequent measurements of compartment pressure should be done in these patients.
We suggest early decompressive fasciotomy because the morbidity caused by fasciotomy in a borderline compartment syndrome is far outweighed by the morbidity that accompanies an undiagnosed untreated compartment syndrome with possible nerve palsy.
Aim: The long-term effect of DNase with cystic fibrosis was examined.
Teeth are most important for the identification of unknown cadavers.
The police publish difficult cases of unidentified bodies in dental print media.
Using their records such as x-rays or documented dental work dentists can often recognize an unknown person and thus contribute to the identification.
To evaluate the efficency of this procedure 177 cases published between 1975 and 1995 were examined.
Only 3% of the examined cases could be identified due to a reaction to publishing in the dental print media.
To improve the presentation of identification cases in the dental print media 500 dentists were asked to take part in a survey.
According to these results a new concept of presentation sould be developed to improve the efficency of this odontoforensic method.
New technological possibilities such as digital x-raying or online data transfer could open new ways for forensic identification.
In a fatality after oral intake of a large amount of an insecticide spray consisting of propoxur, tetramethrine and the solvents isopropanol and benzyl alcohol, a coagulation nectrotic fixation of the oesophagus and stomach were the main morphological findings.
The concentrations determined by HPLC and GC/MS in femoral blood, liver, kidney, vitreous humor and liquor were in the comatose lethal range for propoxur (< 0.3-18 µg/g), whereas tetrametrin (up to 0.1 µg/g) was almost completely decomposed.
The propoxur decomposition product o-isopropoxyphenol (2.8-56 µg/g), benzyl alcohol (18-58 µg/g) and its oxydation product benzoic acid (85-140 µg/g), isopropanol (0.45-1.1 mg/g) and acetone (0.01-0.03 mg/g) were also found.
On the other hand, the concentrations in heart blood and lung tissue were up to 30 times higher.
As a reason for these immense concentration differences an agonale aspiration of the highly concentrated liquid stomach content after vomiting immediately before death is discussed.
The extent of the metabolization of propoxur to o-isopropoxyphenol and of benzyl alcohol to benzoic acid, which is assumed to proceed mainly postmortem, was quite different in the materials investigated and was almost complete in the liver.
The intoxication by the acetylcholine esterase inhibitor propoxur in combination with the neurotoxic effect of tetramethrine was determined as the cause of death.
Background: Despite the fact that deep lamellar keratoplasty (DLKP) is less invasive than to penetrating keratoplasty (PKP), this procedure is rarely performed.
We therefore investigated whether or not the DLKP technique we employed can achieve stable improvement of visual acuity.
Palmoplantar keratodermia (PPK) varians and PPK punctata are considered different entities within the group of hereditary palmoplantar keratodermas.
Keratosis punctata of the palmar creases constitutes a localized form of keratodermia palmoplantaris punctata.
We describe a 31-year-old man exhibiting both nummular and papular keratoses on the soles, as well as small punctate keratoses confined to the palmar creases.
In view of the co-occurrence of these two types of PPK, the question arises whether keratosis palmoplantaris of the varians and the punctate type represent distinct entities or represent variable manifestations of the same gene defect.
The author gives a synoptic view on the paths and routes of emigration the jewish and/or political reasons persecuted psychoanalysts had to take in order to escape national socialist Germany.
With reference to current studies on emigration, which for Germany differentiates three distinctive phases of emigration between 1933 and 1938, the immigration policy especially of the United States and Great Britain and its impact on the concrete circumstances and modalities for the emigration of the particular professional group of psychoanalysts is described and discussed.
In this context, the major importance of the solidarity and help the refugees were granted by the international psychoanalytic community and performed in spite of partially major theoretical differences and institutional rivalries is emphasized.
Acute suppurative thyroiditis is very rare in childhood.
We describe the clinical signs and the diagnostic and therapeutic procedures of thyroid abscesses in children, and add 2 own cases of this rare disease.
In the first case, diagnosis of piriform sinus fistula was made finally after repeated drainage for recurrent abscesses of the left thyroid.
Operative excision of the fistula was performed and the child is doing well since then.
In the second case, a left sided thyroid abscess was treated by incision and drainage only.
Seven years later, no recurrent abscess occurred in this child.
In conclusion, especially in left sided and recurrent thyroid abscesses the patients should be examined for a piriform sinus fistula as a route of infection.
If present, complete removal of the fistula is essential for permanent cure.
The importance of spiral-CT is clinically accepted for diagnosing spreading disease and for making a decision about the therapy strategy for head and neck tumors.
Its importance for follow-up after radiotherapy was examined in 26 patients with irradiated laryngeal tumors.
Using spiral-CT multiple signs of alterations (n=98) can be diagnosed, which are not only important for tumour relapse, but also for assessment.
Spiral-CT offers the possibility of achieviny various additional information about the larynx that cannot be obtained with laryngoscopy.
In follow-up examinations after radiation, laryngoscopy and spiral-CT are recommended as an integrated neck examination using the breath-holding technique (separately reconstructed) and also as functional spiral-CT of the vocal cords in "I"-phonation.
Simpson in Scotland was the first to describe the administration of ether for analgesia in painful deliveries.
Only a few days later E.C.J.
von Siebold (*1801 in Würzburg - \dagger1861 in Göttingen) performed the first systematic study on ether in obstetrics.
Following a preceding evaluation of the action of ether on non-pregnant woman and on pregnant women not in active labour, he administered ether for analgesia during the second stage of labour in eight parturients.
The first administration was on February 25th 1847.
While he was satisfied with the good analgesia without sequelae of the new-born, he was discouraged by the termination of uterine contractions observed in all his patients.
He concluded that ether was not a useful substance for analgesia during vaginal delivery, since it disturbed the natural course of labour.
On the other hand, von Siebold was very pleased with the administration of ether for operative obstetric procedures such as forceps deliveries or placental retention.
Background: Mode switching aims to maintain a ventricular rhythm that matches metabolic needs during both sinus rhythm and atrial tachyarrhythmias.
This allows patients with atrial arrhythmias to benefit from AV synchronous pacing modes.Aim and method: Beat-to-beat mode switching in Diamond and Clarity pacemakers is designed to maintain a relatively stable ventricular rhythm, ensuring consistent ventricular filling patterns.
Atrial tachyarrhythmia detection is based on a continuous analysis of the atrial rhythm.
A too rapid increase of the atrial rate with a beat-to-beat acceleration > 15 bpm is considered to be an atrial tachyarrhythmia.
Mode switching occurs on detection of the first premature atrial event: atrial tracking is stopped and the ventricular rate is determined by the rate indicated by the dual sensor (QT interval and activity).
Atrial pacing restores AV synchrony immediately after cessation of the atrial tachyarrhythmia, effectively avoiding retrograde conduction.
Dedicated diagnostic functions allow one to monitor the incidence of atrial tachyarrhythmias and to study atrial and ventricular events just prior to its onset.
Both the mode switching and rate responsive function are fully automatic, rendering follow-up procedures easy and less time-consuming.
Conclusion: Reliable detection of all atrial events is essential to guarantee appropriate mode switching.
Therefore, the pacemaker stores the distribution of the amplitude of all atrial events, both during sinus rhythm and atrial tachyarrhythmias, which facilitates the appropriate programming of the atrial sensitivity.
Introduction: Mediastinal diseases are mostly diagnosed by CT and MRI.
The applicability of ultrasound is limited by the surrounding air- and bone-containing thorax, which permits only restricted echo windows.
Transesophageal endoscopic ultrasonography circumvents this problem and ensures visualization of parts of the mediastinum.
Blood glucose alterations prior to cerebral ischaemia are associated with poor neurologic outcome, possibly due to extensive lactic acidosis or energy failure.
Cerebral effects of hyper- or hypoglycaemia during cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) are less well known.
In addition, little information is available concerning cardiac effects of blood glucose alterations.
The aim of this study was to evaluate the effects of pre-cardiac-arrest hypo- or hyperglycaemia compared to normoglycaemia upon haemodynamics, cerebral blood flow (CBF) and metabolism (CMRO2), and regional cardiac blood flow during CPR subsequent to 3 min of cardiac and respiratory arrest and after restoration of spontaneous circulation.
After approval by the State Animal Investigation Committee, 29 mechanically ventilated, anaesthetised pigs were instrumented for haemodynamic monitoring and blood flow determination by the radiolabeled microsphere technique.
The animals were randomly assigned to one of three groups: in group I (n=9) blood glucose was not manipulated; in group II (n=10) blood glucose was increased by slow infusion of 40% glucose to 319 +/- 13 mg/dl; in group III (n=10) blood glucose was lowered by careful titration with insulin to 34 +/- 2 mg/dl.
After 3 min of untreated ventricular fibrillation and respiratory arrest, CPR (chest compressor/ventilator (Thumper) and epinephrine infusion) was commenced and continued for 8 min.
Thereafter, defibrillation was attempted, and if successful, the animals were observed for another 240 min.
Cerebral perfusion pressure (CPP), CBF, CMRO2, coronary perfusion pressure (CorPP), and regional cardiac blood flow were determined at control, after 3 min of CPR, and at 10, 30, and 240 min post-CPR.
In group I, 4/9 animals (44%) could be successfully resuscitated; in group II 4/10 (40%); and in group III 0/10 (0%).
Prior to cardiac arrest, mean arterial pressure, CPP, and CorPP in group III were significantly lower compared to groups I and II.
In group I, CPP during CPR was 26 +/- 6 mmHg; CBF 31 +/- 9 ml/min/100 g CMRO2 3.8 +/- 1.2 ml/min/100 g; CorPP 18 +/- 5 mmHg; and left ventricular (LV) flow 35 +/- 15 ml/min/100 g. In group II: CPP=21 +/- 5; CBF 21 +/- 7; CMRO2 1.8 +/- 0.8; CorPP 16 +/- 6; and LV flow 22 +/- 9; and in group III: CPP 15 +/- 3; CBF 11 +/- 8; CMRO2 1.5 +/- 1.1; CorPP 4 +/- 2; and LV flow 19 +/- 10.
During the 240-min post-resuscitation period, there were no differences in CBF, CMRO2, or LV flow between groups I and II.
Hypoglycaemia prior to cardiac arrest appears to be predictive for a poor cardiac outcome, whereas hyperglycaemia does not impair resuscitability compared to normoglycaemia.
In addition, hyperglycaemia did not affect LV flow, CBF, or CMRO2.
However, it has to be kept in mind that haemodynamics and organ blood flow do not permit conclusions with respect to functional neurologic recovery or histopathologic damage to the brain, which is very likely to be associated with hyperglycaemia.
Abstract  We present an algorithm for the rational diagnosis of glutaric aciduria type I (GA1).
Normal urinary organic acids in patients with non-specific clinical features and normal results of brain imaging render the diagnosis highly unlikely, and no further investigations are required.
In other patients, the diagnostic strategy depends on the individual clinical, neuroradiological and biochemical findings.
GCDH enzyme analysis should be reserved for patients in whom GA1 is very likely.
This article gives a brief review of the history of spinal surgery from the end of the nineteenth century up to our own time.
Malignant lymphomas, originating from peripheral T or NK cells, are rare tumours in Europe and account for less than 10% of all malignant lymphomas.
In this review, the salient features of the more frequently occurring entities derived from T or NK cells will be presented.
Nasal NK/T cell lymphoma is mainly found in the nose and paranasal sinuses and often, but not always, display an angiocentric growth pattern leading to coagulation necrosis.
The tumor cells consistently express CD56, CD2 and the EBER molecules encoded by the Epstein-Barr virus.
Clonal T cell receptor gene rearrangements are often absent indicating, in the majority of cases, a derivation of these tumors from NK cells.
Enteropathy-type intestinal T-cell lymphomas often arise in patients with celiac disease and have a dismal prognosis.
The tumour cells express T cell antigens, CD103 and cytotoxic molecules, but are negative for CD4.
Approximately 20% of the cases display CD56 mostly in combination with CD8.
Recently, an early purely intraepithelial form of this tumour was identified.
Histologically these cases resemble celiac disease, however the intraepithelial lymphocytes often exhibit an abnormal immunophenotype with absent CD8 and T-cell-receptor protein expression, and, they are clonal by molecular analysis.
Clinically, the patients suffer from refractory sprue or ulcerative jejunitis.
The prognosis is bad with the patients often dying from malnutrition or an invasive tumour-forming T-cell lymphoma.
Angioimmunoblastic T-cell lymphoma is defined by characteristic morphological findings (atypical lymphoid cells in part with pale cytoplasm, arborizing high endothelial venules and large FDC-meshworks) as well as clinical features (systemic symptoms, signs of a dysregulated immune response).
Peripheral T-cell lymphomas, that do not fit into a distinct entity, are classified in the REAL and the new WHO classifications as peripheral T-cell lymphomas unspecified.
These display a broad morphological spectrum (including the T-cell lymphomas of different cell sizes, Lennert's lymphoma and T-zone lymphoma of the Kiel-classification) and in general are clinically aggressive.
Causes and courses of the diseases are subjected to a change of an increasing life expectancy on the one hand and technically highly developed medicine on the other hand.
Since a growing number of elderly people is denying intensive medical interventions which serve the purpose of keeping them alive despite severe diseases, the problem of euthanasia imposes direct questions.
A central role is played by the active-passive difference and its moralistic legitimacy.
The difficulties of this difference are discussed below on the applicable level of ethical discussions.
At the same time, knowledge of the danger is being made aware that in a maximal therapeutical orientated medical care system the desire for euthanasia may become identical with the reverse side of this care system.
Isolated severe head trauma (SHT) or SHT in combination with multiple injuries are important factors for the prognosis of morbidity and mortality in patients suffering from the consequences of accidents.
The prognosis mainly depends on the presence of primary mechanic brain injury and the development of secondary brain damage.
Causes for the development of secondary brain damage are the intracranial space demand after traumatic injury and edema formation which may result in iscemia, as well as inflammatory processes.
Both isolated SHT and polytrauma with or without brain damage may result in a systemic inflammatory response syndrome (SIRS) due to the synthesis of cytokines and other inflammatory mediators which may cause a single or multiple organ failure (MOF).
Often the organism is able to survive isolated traumatic injuries and functional disturbances, but in combination or cumulation they may be lethal.
The hypermetabolism after SHT is often regarded as an interaction between the central nervous system and the whole organism by the activation of the neuroendocrine axis.
In contrast to the consequences of SHT for the whole organism, multiple injuries after polytrauma may affect brain functions, such as the shock dependent disturbance of the brain perfusion accompanied by brain hypoxia which may lead to an aggravated prognosis.
Moreover, coagulation, metabolism and fracture healing are influenced by the onset of SIRS as well.
Our knowledge about the bidirectional inflammatory interaction between brain and whole organism is still limited.
In this context, the effects of secondary surgical interventions which may additionally stress a traumatized body have to be considered and are the subject for actual clinical discussions and experimental studies.
This article tries to summarize some important aspects on this topic.
Background: Chronic cough and thoracic pain, commonly caused by upper airway infections, are frequently seen symptoms in pediatrics.
These "benign" symptoms are very seldom caused by malignant disorders.
Methods: In two patients (male, age 41/12 and 43/12 years) chronic cough and thoracic pain were due to a malignant pulmonary neoplasm (Pleuropulmonary blastoma).
Results: Pleuropulmonary blastoma is a rare malignant primary pulmonary neoplasm in childhood with a poor prognosis.
An incomplete resection was performed in both cases.
Both patients received postoperative radiotherapy and combination chemotherapy.
One boy died, the other one is alive and well more than 6 years after diagnosis without evidence of disease.
Conclusion: Our findings indicate that even after incomplete resection subsequent multimodal therapy (adjuvant chemotherapy and radiotherapy) can provide a long term remission.
In 12 patients with systemic sclerosis the influence of hypnosis and autogenic training on the acral blood circulation and the coping with the disease was investigated in a pilot study.
In the first step significant increases in the skin temperature of the fingers (mean +/- SD: 3.9 +/- 1.2  °C) could be found after relaxation hypnosis.
In the second step six patients (study group) gained experience with autogenic training.
The other six patients served as control group.
In the study group, the skin temperature of the fingers (short-term effect) was significantly higher than in the control group (1.9 +/- 1.0  °C).
Long-term effects of the autogenic training (mean acral rewarning time, duration and course of the Raynaud attacks, acral lesions of the hands, psychosomatic status of complaints, type of relation to the disease as precondition for coping with the disease) were not found within the relatively short follow-up period of 4 months.
Two patients, however, reported that they could shorten the duration of Raynaud attacks by autogenic training.
In our patients heterogenicity and an increased score of multiple psychosomatic complaints were registered at the outset.
As far as the type of relation to the disease is concerned, the patients could be assessed as almost adapted.
Hypnosis and autogenic training can be recommended as complementary therapy in systemic sclerosis.
Abstract The term acute exacerbation of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) reflects an acute worsening of the stable state with an increase in dyspnea, cough, and count or purulence of sputum.
The management of an acute exacerbation is guided mainly clinical severity which has implications on the decision of outpatient management, hospital management or intensive care treatment.
Cardiopulmonary comorbidity and the number of previous exacerbations are prognostic factors.
The first-line therapy of each exacerbation is the intensification of drug-treatment with 2-agonists and anticholinergics.
Systemic steroids as a short-term course are advocated if hospital-treatment is necessary.
Infections of the respiratory tract are a frequent cause of acute exacerbations.
However, a colonization with potential pathogenic microorganisms is found in many patients in the stable state.
Antibiotic treatment is justified if cardiopulmonary comorbidity and frequent previous exacerbations are present.
The severity of airflow obstruction and the frequency of previous exacerbations are linked to the spectrum of the underlying microorganisms.
This should be borne in mind for the choice of the antimicrobiotic treatment.
Noninvasive ventilation in severe exacerbation is able to improve gas-exchange and to reduce the work of breathing.
As a consequence the number of intubations and the attributable morbidity and mortality are reduced.
If invasive mechanical ventilation is necessary, the potential of dynamic hyperinflation in acute exacerbation has to be considered.
Background: In 1986 Prof. H. Olbing (University of Essen Pediatrics Department), supported by Prof. G. Stickler (Mayo Medical School, Minnesota), introduced a 4-weeks clinical skills lab for all students (annual class 250), based on self-instruction by means of computer-assisted, interactive, audiovisual learning materials, models, bedside teaching and seminars on special topics (partially peer-guided).
Each year 14 chosen senior medical students get a two weeks intensive training in order to function as peer tutors for the bedside teaching.
The peer tutors train the junior students in basic behaviour and clinical examination skills.
Each tutor is active during 4-5 skills lab periods, and in each period he/she coaches two groups of two students each.
During the bedside teaching phase each group examines and presents four patients.
Spinal injuries referring to banal falls are common injuries in elderly persons.
Up to 55 years of age spinal fractures are more frequent in men while its opposite in older persons.
There are two typical lesions: odontoid fracture in the upper cervical spine and compression fracture in thoracolumbar spine.
Odontoid fracture is the most frequent lesion in cervical spine in the elderly.
This is caused by trabecular structure of dens axis and spine's stiffness in old age.
Instable fractures in extension type II are most common.
In many cases the instability of the lesion is hidden and can be first seen in functional examination controlled by x-ray.
Conservative treatment is efficient in stable lesions type III while there is a high risk for pseudarthrosis in treatment of instable lesions in elderly with Halo Fixateur e. g. We think that the best operation for these fractures is the anterior screw fixation.
If this is not sufficient because of low bone mass or early dislocation of the screws a dorsal fusion C1/C2 with transarticular screwing e. g. should be done.
Because of rare symptoms thoracolumbar fractures in osteoporosis are hidden frequently.
In many cases it's not easy to distinguish acute lesions from healed fractures or tumor lesions.
Therefore there are just few compression fractures (A type) that have to be treated operatively.
Instable lesions type B and C must be operated as well in the elderly as in the young.
Because of low bone mass in elderly the dorsal instrumentation should include more than just the two injured segments.
An even more adequate stabilisation is done with an additional vertebral replacement.
Following curative minimal-invasive laser resection of T1-T3 laryngeal carcinomas, patients were subjected to an intensive voice rehabilitation.
Therapy was effected twice a day for approximately 2 months, utilizing the concept of functional voice therapy.
Before and after rehabilitation, acoustic analyses were made by using two different computer-supported measuring systems: (1) the "multidimensional voice program" (Kay Elementrics Corp.) and (2) a novel software program developed in Göttingen that includes a new voice quality parameter based on correlations between frequency bands.
Acoustic analyses showed superiority of the glottal versus supraglottal compensatory phonation.
Findings showed that not all acoustic parameters equally documented voice improvement after rehabilitation.
The standard deviation of fundamental frequency was the only parameter showing a significant post-therapeutic improvement.
A further suitable acoustic method proved to be the voice quality parameter that has been newly introduced by us.
In contrast to analogous parameters of other methods, this approach is independent of the exact periodicity of the glottal excitation function, thus permitting reliable results to be obtained even with aphonic or heavily dysphonic voices.
Aseptic pseudarthrosis may occur after all kinds of traumatology treatment.
Following conservative treatment, incomplete immobilisation or an unattached bone fragment can be causal.
After plate osteosynthesis the biomechanical principles are not efficient or the circulatory damage delays healing.
There are two broad types of pseudarthrosis: vascular and nonvascular.
The extent of vascularisation can be demonstrated by bone scintigraphy as well as X-ray.
The treatment of vascular nonunions is very common.
Mechanical stability is required, therefore a new osteosynthesis is desirable.
Osteoporosis caused by inactivity and dislocation increases the rate of complications.
Much more difficult problems are encountered in treatment of unreactive and avital pseudarthrosis, particularly in cases with a defect of bone substance.
These defects can be treated with a segment transfer and a fibula-to-tibia operation.
Extracorporal lithotripsy has been established as a new method in treatment of active and vascular nonunions.
Former osteosynthesis is not a contraindication.
Stability and immobilisation are necessary.
Treatment in the low-frequency magnetic field shows no effect.
Correct biomechanical and biological osteosynthesis with proper attention paid to location, quality of bone and asepsis can avoid the development of a pseudarthrosis.
Aim of the study: The goal of this study was to assess the prevalence of ophthalmological abnormalities in 10 year old survivors with extremely low birthweight of 500-999 g. In addition the association between retinopathy of prematurity and other ophthalmological disorders was studied.
Background: Although the majority of surgeons regard Hartmann's operation as therapeutic standard in perforations of the colon complicated by peritonitis this procedure has been critically discussed in recent years.
Advocates of one-stage techniques criticized bad postoperative results (high morbidity and mortality) and long-term outcome (low rates of intestinal restoration).
The aim of our study was to investigate whether the late results after Hartmann's operation justify this criticism.
Method: From 1982 to 1997 Hartmann's operations were performed in 103 patients for colonic perforations.
In 63 % of cases inflammatory diseases caused colonic complications.
The average Mannheimer Peritonitis Index (MPI) was 19.
Seventeen patients died postoperatively (mortality: 16.5 %).
In 69 patients (80 %) intestinal restoration could be performed after an average interval of 122 days (complication rate: 6 %, no mortality).
On follow-up, patients were asked to give information on their general state, changes of housing, abdominal complaints, and quality of life.
Results: Data on 93 % of patients could be obtained.
The median follow-up time was 75 months.
Eleven patients had died; the remaining 72 were investigated.
86 % described the quality of their lives as good or very good; only 11 % indicated severe loss of activity.
Quality of life did not differ between patients in whom intestinal continuity had been restored and those in whom it had not been restored.
Anastomotic strictures developed in 7 % of cases, always after stapled anastomosis.
Conclusions: According to our results, long-term outcome after Hartmann's operation is good.
80 % of patients underwent intestinal restoration with low morbidity (6 %) and no mortality.
A great majority of patients indicated the quality of their lives as good or very good: this assessment was not dependent on restoration of intestinal continuity.
Tibial torsion defects are usually not clinically evident and, hence, are often overlooked.
Clinical examination and CT scan have proved to be the best ways of measuring static tibial torsion, whereas dynamic measurements are usually performed in the clinic and the "gait laboratory."
Only few studies have determined there to be a connection between a torsion defect in the lower leg and expected pathological conditions of the knee and ankle joints.
However, patellofemoral instability, Osgood-Schlatter disease, osteochondrosis dissecans are increasingly being found in cases of increased external tibial torsion and arthrosis in reduced torsion.
The aim of this study was to ascertain to what extent homeless, mentally ill subjects in Munich take advantage of available psychosocial services.
To obtain a representative picture of the situation, the first step was to ascertain how many people in Munich are actually homeless.
The next step was to ascertain what proportion of them are in need of psychotherapy.
Using the standardized Diagnostic Interview Schedule (DIS), 146 men and 32 women were interviewed.
The results according to the DSM-III demonstrated high lifelong and 6-month prevalence of psychic disturbances.
Medical and social services were often enjoyed, but mostly over a short period of time in particularly critical situations.
Women were treated more often than men.
Elements such as age and level of education hardly influenced patients' seeking help.
Despite a high prevalence of addictive disease, alcohol and drug clinics were rarely consulted.
The increase in the number of diagnoses was paralleled by an increase in the number of patients seeking help.
Most treatments involved schizophrenia and anxiety.
By means of logistic regression models, predictors of the extent to which these services were used were analysed.
We conclude that new clinical models are needed and that the aversion to the present care system is too great.
Continued treatment occurs only rarely.
Electrocardiographic and clinical characteristics are currently used as diagnostic criteria for the long QT-syndrome.
In borderline electrocardiographic findings associated with unclear syncope, it is often difficult to ensure or exclude long QT-syndrome.
Schwartz and coworkers therefore created a point system as a guide in clinical decision making.
In recent years genetic diagnostics have entered the arena of long-QT assessment.
Aside from new insights into the pathophysiology of the long QT-disorder, it is expected that genetic diagnostics will offer substantial help to ascertain long QT-syndrome in patients with borderline electrocardiographic and clinical findings and improve risk stratification in long-QT family members.
Performing linkage analysis, coupling of autosomal-dominant congenital long QT-syndrome (Romano-Ward Syndrome) to chromosomes 11 (LQT1/11p15.5), 3 (LQT3/3p21), 7 (LQT2/7q35), and 4 (LQT4/4q25-27) was demonstrated.
More recently, the disease genes in long QT-syndrome 1, 2, and 3 could be identified.
Analysis of the base-pair sequence allowed detection of several different mutations in different families illustrating genetic heterogeneity.
Aside from diagnostic aspects, molecular genetics may also guide pharmacological therapy by identifying the specific ion-channel disorder leading to QT-prolongation and sudden death.
During the past 4 years we have demonstrated in eyes with corneal pathology that applanation tonometry (Goldmann, Perkins) generally delivers falsely low measurements in comparison to intraocular needle tonometry.
The aim of this study was to evaluate whether impression tonometry (Schioetz) is more precise than applanation tonometry in determinating the intraocular pressure in eyes with corneal disorders.
The case of a 24-year-old woman with a plunging ranula is reported.
Primarily, the patient noticed extensive swelling of the neck, which had developed 3 months previously.
The polycystic, firmly attached tumor and the sublingual and submandibular glands of the right side of the neck were surgically removed.
Pathological examination showed a retention cyst by means of a plunging ranula.
The etiology, pathogenesis, clinical aspect and diagnostic procedures for the plunging ranula are described.
Various therapeutic possibilities are discussed in regard to their value.
We prefer surgical treatment with a histological examination to verify the diagnosis.
The plunging ranula originates on the sublingual gland; therefore, its simultaneous extirpation is recommended to avoid recurrences.
In extensive cases, the additional removal of the submandibular gland can be advised.
Cranial dural fistulae are rare; when they occur, it is usually difficult to detect them at an early stage.
With a view to the question of possible progress in diagnosis we now report on seven patients with lateral dural fistulae fed by branches of the external carotid artery.
The examination was carried out before selective arteriography using cw-Doppler sonography and colour coded duplex sonography in combination.
Sonographic criteria for detection of hyperperfusion take account of flow velocity as well as pulsatility.
In all cases hyperperfusion of the external carotid artery and the common carotid artery was detected.
In most of these cases pathologic findings were also observed at the occipital artery, and more rarely in the contralateral external carotid artery or the ipsilateral vertebral artery, in addition.
A possible source of error arising from confusion of blood vessels was present with the cw-Doppler sonography, but not for colour coded duplex sonography.
Therefore, cranial dural fistulae characterized by a high shunt volume can be diagnosed correctly by indirect Doppler sonographic criteria using cw-Doppler and duplex sonography.
Direct visualization of the fistula and its nidus requires additional selective arteriography, in the course of which endovascular embolization may be performed.
Background: Echocardiography is a standard imaging technique for the assessment of heart valve disease.
The good spatial and temporal resolution is the basis for different methods which provide information about the severity of such defects.
Dynamic colour visualisation and volumetric measurements of regurgitant jets are a new evaluating tool for the assessment of heart valve insufficiencies.
In Germany, as in all industrial nations, there has been an increase in the number of cases of cancer and in cancer-related mortality.
According to the German Federal Bureau of Statistics, in 1998 nearly 213,000 persons died due to malignant cancer.
Cancer patients generally have physical and psychological dysfunction that may in turn cause a significant reduction in quality of life if treatment is performed insufficiently or not at all.
Pain is the dominant symptom and can have serious effects on the patient and his or her family.
Although various organizations have published treatment plans for adequate pain therapy, in many cases they are not adequately applied by physicians.
This work therefore offers a comprehensive review of pain therapy as an essential component of palliative medicine.
This retrospective study shows the results in 30 patients of revision surgery on their reruptured ACL.
The follow-up time was 30 months on average (range 10 - 54 months).
The follow-up examination included subjective (Lysholm score, Tegner activity level rating score), clinical and radiological criteria and also instrumental laxity testing with the KT-1000 arthrometer.
The overall evaluation was done according to the IKDC score.
The follow up showed subjective and objective results almost equal to those after primary surgery on ACL.
The IKDC score revealed certain abnormal and highly abnormal results, which demonstrated that revision ACL surgery gives poorer results than primary surgery.
Nevertheless, we recommend reconstruction of a torn ACL even in a revision case to restore the knee function and prevent further menisceal and chondral damage and degeneration.
Nowadays, restorative proctocolectomy is considered the "gold standard" in the surgical therapy of ulcerative colitis.
Alternative procedures such as Brooke ileostomy or Kock pouch are limited to special indications.
Preservation of function is the decisive advantage of the ileoanal pouch, but preservation of function is not equal to quality of life.
Quality of life is a multidimensional concept that is difficult to define and measure.
Quality of life can only be assessed by standardized and validated quality-of-life questionnaires.
Preoperatively, patients with ulcerative colitis have a restricted quality of life, depending on the intensity of their disease.
Proctocolectomy is the curative therapy and improves quality of life.
When evaluating quality of life it is not essential if patients are treated by Brooke ileostomy or restorative proctocolectomy.
The advantage of restorative proctocolectomy is the improvement in some aspects such as sexuality and physical acticity.
The "Total Quality-of-Life Index" is not impoved.
Preoperatively, patients should be informed that preservation of function by restorative proctocolectomy is accompanied by an increased postoperative morbidity in comparison to other procedures.
Decreased quality-of-life results when complications occur postoperatively that cannot be controlled over a long period of time.
In some cases excision of the ileoanal pouch may be the most sensible way of solving the problems.
On the other hand, patients without complications and good function after ileoanal pouch procedure may achieve a quality of life comparable to that of healthy controls.
Preoperatively, patients should be aware of this risk-benefit relationship and should share the responsibility of the decision for or against restorative proctocolectomy.
The objective of this investigation was the experimental determination of the contact pressures in the hip joint for characteristic phases of the gait cycle.
The joint forces determined in vivo with telemetric endoprosthesis by Bergmann et al.
(1993) were converted into a pelvic reference system, based on kinematic gait analysis.
In eight cadaveric hip joints (age 18-75 yrs.)
the reaction forces were applied corresponding to four phases of the gait cycle (heel strike, mid-stance, heel off, toe off) and the pressure distribution determined with FUJI pressure sensitive film.
We found maxima of 10 MPa during mid stance.
The areas of highest pressure were located in the ventro-superior aspect of the acetabulum (anterior part of the acetabular roof) and in the dorso-inferior aspect of the lunate surface.
The pressure distribution was relatively constant during the four phases and the maxima did not vary proportional to the applied load.
The normal pressure distribution in the hip appears to be determined by the physiological incongruity of the articular surfaces and the inhomogeneous bony support of the acetabulum.
During operative interventions this normal load transfer should be restored as accurately as possible.
In spite of its serious sequelae, volatile substance abuse (VSA) attracts very little public attention in Germany.
Our case report describes an adult male who inhaled propane for recreational purposes.
Initially, he achieved short-lived euphoria and hallucinations.
He compensated for the developing tolerance by increasing the dosage, finally consuming 5 litres of fluid propane daily.
Getting such quantities was facilitated by his occupational access to propane.
Since he abused the propane in an apartment house, he also exposed third parties to the danger of explosion.
Clinical examination revealed disturbances in orientation, restricted perceptivity and concentration, reduced mnemonic performance, and psychomotor agitation.
All these symptoms diminished during a 6-month follow-up.
The relationship of his organic mental disorder to the abuse of propane was not clear, since he had also abused alcohol.
Objectives The Marburg external patellotibial (Mpt) fixator is designed to temporarily protect a reconstructed distal extensor apparatus of the knee.
It allows an early functional aftercare.
The indications or ultrasound in the evaluation of pulmonary disorders are described.
Clinical applications are several lung diseases in adults and especially in children.
In specific, well-defined applications, the feasibilties of ultrasound are promising.
Sonography provides important additional information to chest X-ray and is even superior to CT under special circumstances.
Pulmonary sonography is a useful link between conventional X-ray and more expensive cross-sectional imaging.
In the evaluation of pulmonary diseases at present the potential of ultrasound is not optimally used.
Traditionally oral surgeons and dentists have evaluated the jaws using intraoral films and panoramic radiographs.
The involvement of radiologists has been limited.
In the past few years dedicated CT-software-programs developed to evaluate dental implant patients have provided a new look at the jaws.
The complex anatomy is described and identified on human skulls and on axial, panoramic, and cross-sectional images.
With this anatomic description Dental-CT-scans are used to demonstrate the anatomy of maxilla and the mandible.
An overview of the technique of Dental-CT is provided, furthermore the radiation dose of different organs is explained.
Suggestions to reduce these doses by simple modifications of the recommended procols are given.
The debate on passive and active euthanasia has met a controversial echo both in the German-speaking media and in professional publications within recent years.
This discussion, however, largely excluded mentally ill  patients.
Also, euthanasia advocacy groups have usually distanced themselves from  euthanasia in psychiatric patients.
We report here two cases from our hospital in which in-patients with affective disorders committed assisted suicide during a hospital pass.
We discuss these events under the assumption that these are cases of questionable active euthanasia in mentally ill patients whose judgement was considerably compromised by their disorder.
Definition of the problem: In Germany, the dissection rate of the deceased is distinctly lower than in many other European countries.
Although critics of autopsies use to put forward ethical objections and religious scruples, neither the Christian church nor piety stand opposite to the practise of autopsies.
Currently undergoing a clinical trial a new miniaturized monoplane ultrasound probe potentially enhances the practicability of perioperative transesophageal echocardiography (TEE) without loss of echocardiographic quality.
Methods: In the present prospective study, the nasally inserted miniaturized TEE probe was tested in 12 ventilated patients and compared with a conventional TEE probe.
Echocardiographic quality was tested by two independent investigators by analyzing the percentage of the endocardium contour detection (<50%, 50-75%, 75-100%) in the left ventricular short- and long-axis views.
Results: In 11 patients, more than 50% of endocardium were visualized continuously with both probes.
Although the nasal TEE probe was inferior to conventional TEE in detecting lateral endocardium, automated endocardium detection compared well with both methods.
Inter- and intraobserver variability in manual measurements of the left ventricular cross-sectional area was below 5% on average and differed non-significantly with regard to the method.
In 2 patients, continuous monitoring was aggravated by repeated loss of contact between the miniaturized TEE probe and mucosa.
Conclusions: In comparison with conventional TEE, the miniaturized TEE probe provides practicability advantages without significant loss of information for cardiovascular monitoring.
By means of modern color-coded duplex sonography (CCDS) even very small vessels can be visualized.
Maximum resolution nowadays is about 0.5 mm diameter of the vessel.
We compared the use of CCDS and angiography in studying of acral perfusion.
Besides morphologic criteria, hemodynamic criteria were recorded.
Arteries in healthy fingers appear as long and straight vessels with a clearly defined border.
The physiological maximal blood flow velocity exceded 20 cm/s.
CCDS revealed tortuosity of finger arteries as typical finding in thrombangiitis obliterans.
Segmental stenosis can either be identified morphologically or quantified by measurement of the flow velocity with poststenotic maximal systolic velocities of less than 20 cm/s or by the acceleration of the blood flow within the stenosis, as proven by angiographic examinations.
CCDS is suitable for evaluation of acral perfusion in patients suffering from secondary Raynaud's syndrome.
Apart from diagnosis of disturbed acral circulation, other possible applications of CCDS are in in the surgical field, for example replantations in hand or finger surgery.
The discussion of the Osheroff vs Chestnut Lodge court case in the "American Journal of Psychiatry" raised the question whether individual psychotherapy or pharmacotherapy is the appropriate treatment for severe depression.
A summary of the crucial points and a review of the clinical and scientific implications of this case is presented.
In addition, the difference between psychiatrists and psychotherapists regarding the assessment of depressive disorders is examined by analysing results of the ICD-10 research criteria study.
In the case of one patient with dysthymia (ICD-10 RC: F34.1) psychotherapists tended more towards a reactive or neurotic etiology than psychiatrists.
By contrast, the percentage of clinicians suspecting an endogenous etiology and thus, diagnosing a psychosis and starting a psychopharmacotherapy was markedly higher among psychiatrists.
In conclusion, the integration of different conceptualizations and treatment modalities is emphasized as an essential task for both psychotherapists and psychiatrists.
For certain patients, an integrated therapy may be more effective.
A 43-year-old patient was admitted for severe claudicatio in his right leg, doppler ultrasound and angiography revealed an occluded right common iliac artery.
Using the cross-over-approach from the contralateral side, it was possible to navigate a guide wire through the occlusion, and after passage with an excimer laser an ipsilateral retrograde puncture with placement of a sheath was performed.
In order to protect the the aortoiliac bifurcation, a primary stent implantation of the occluded side was carried out using the kissing balloon technique.
Afterwards three stents were placed.
Subsequently the patient completely improved; treadmill exercise test and duplex sonography showed good results.
Conclusion: Using the kissing balloon technique, laser-assisted recanalisation of iliac artery occlusions even involving the aortoiliac bifurcation compare favorable to other more invasive treatments.
A surgical procedure can thus be avoided.
The typical MRI features of the most common pancreatic diseases, such as pancreatitis and adenocarcinoma of the pancreas, have been established.
However, even in these common pancreatic disorders, MRI correlation with the underlying pathology is limited for clinical reasons.
We emphasize MR-pathological correlation of inflammatory and neoplastic pancreatic changes, including pancreatitis, adenocarcinoma, acinar cell carcinoma, rare cystic and solid pancreatic neoplasms, and islet cell tumors.
By highlighting the correlation of key pathological features with MR findings, a better understanding of the MR appearance of pancreatic pathology can be provided.
In addition, MRI may prove a powerful tool in detection and characterization of pancreatic tumors.
Background: The implantation of a femoro-popliteal bypass graft represents the gold standard in the management of arteriosclerotic occlusive disease in the femoro-popliteal region.
Application of interventional techniques has permitted the development of a novel, endovascular implantable bypass system.
The device is placed within the lumen of the superficial femoral artery.
The present study investigated the technical properties of the new system in cadavers, with subsequent evaluation of its application in humans.
Methods: The endopass consists of a thin-wall polycarbourethane tube with a total length of 53 cm.
The distal end is connected with a self-expanding stent prothesis 4 cm in length.
Endovascular implantation is performed through a groin incision.
Following antegrade ringstripper-TEA, the endopass is introduced into the femoral artery after placement of a guide wire.
The proximal anastomosis is performed surgically.
Results: The technical requirements and feasibility of the system were tested on 12 cadaver extremities.
Implantation of the device proved technically successful in seven of eight extremities with significant occlusion of the superficial femoral artery.
The most important problems included the complete ringstripper-TEA, the placement of the guide wire following the TEA, and the expansion of the endopass.
Following approval by the ethics commission, the endopass was implanted in five patients between June 1997 and March 1998.
In three patients, the endopass remained patent and has functioned well.
One patient with poor vascular outflow suffered an early noncorrectable occlusion, while in the remaining case, perforation secondary to the ringstripper procedure forced us to abandon the attempt.
Conclusion: Experience from the cadaver study and initial human applications confirm the feasibility of this method.
Further development and methodological improvement, however, are necessary requiring additional, larger studies on patients.
Introduction: There is no data available on the action of etomidate on ion currents in human neuronal cells.
Therefore the effects of etomidate on a human neuronal delayed rectifer potassium current were investigated.
In order to evaluate patients' exposure to radiation in computed tomography, dose quantities such as the computed tomography dose index (CTDI), multiple scan average dose (MSAD) and dose free in air on the axis of rotation are used.
The CTDI and the MSAD, derivable from the CTDI, are a good measure for the absorbed doses in the examined volume, but they do not take the biological sensitivity of the organs into account and do not describe the radiogenic risk that is actually relevant for patients and doctors.
The dose on the axis of rotation is not an accurate measure of the effective dose and the radiogenic risk.
The declaration of a limit for the dose on the axis of rotation should take the different regions into account, in order to guarantee acceptable image quality on one hand and to avoid an unnecessarily high risk on the other side.
As physical dose quantities, the CTDI, MSAD and dose on the axis of rotation are useful to characterize and differentiate between programs and systems concerning radiation exposure.
Prognosis of patients surviving acute myocardial infarction has substantially improved over the last two decades.
However, stratification of patients at risk for death due to arrhythmic events remains a clinical challenge.
Due to the important role of the autonomic nervous system in the genesis of sudden death, autonomic markers such as heart rate variability and baroreflex sensitivity have recently gained attention as risk stratification parameters.
The present study reports the results of noninvasive risk stratification in 411 consecutive postinfarction patients treated due to contemporary therapeutical guidelines with a high proportion of patients discharged with a patent infarct related artery.
The diagnostic arsenal of risk parameters comprised heart rate variability, baroreflex sensitivity, and more traditional markers such as non-sustained ventricular tachycardia, left ventricular ejection fraction, and ventricular late potentials.
Patiens were followed for a mean of 33  +/- 21 months.
Stepwise logistic regression analysis revealed that left ventricular function, both autonomic markers, and the patency of the infarct related artery were independent predictors of the prospectively defined primary study endpoint, i.e., all-cause mortality plus ventricular tachyarrhythmic events.
With respect to the secondary endpoint (ventricular tachyarrhythmic events), left ventricular function, heart rate variability, and infarct vessel patency were independent predictors.
Ventricular late potentials and nonsustained ventricular tachycardia had no predictive value with respect to ventricular tachyarrhythmic events.
These findings from a large prospective long-term study demonstrate the value of markers of cardiac autonomic tone in identifying infarct survivors at risk for malignant ventricular tachyarrhythmias and sudden death.
K+ Channels and Cardiotoxicity of Drugs: Implications for Drug Toxicity Assessment - The time required for repolarization of the ventricles can be measured as the QT interval of the ECG and is determined primarily by activation of the delayed rectifier K+ current (IK), which consists of a rapid component (IKr) and a slow component (IKs).
Drugs that block cardiac IKr prolong the cardiac action potential (AP).
Prolonged repolarization is detected as a longer QT interval on the ECG.
During prolonged APs, increased inward currents induce early afterdepolarizations, which increase the risk of Torsades de pointes (TdP) cardiac arrhythmias.
TdP arrhythmia is characterized by an apparent twisting of the electrical axis around the isoelectric line.
It has a rate of 150 to 250 beats/min and it can occasionally degenerate into ventricular fibrillation that may be fatal.
The incidence of drug-induced TdP arrhythmias is highest among class IA and class III antiarrhythmic agents.
However, under certain clinical conditions, also several non-cardiovascular medicinal products induce QT interval prolongations in the ECG or TdP arrhythmias.
Since all drugs known to cause TdP block IKr, an early evaluation of possible effects on APs of cardiac myocytes expressing IKr channels during the developmental phases of novel drugs seems to be recommended.
If in-vitro electrophysiological studies show the new active substance to induce AP prolongation and/or K+ channel blockade in appropriate models and at relevant concentrations,  either further development of the new active substance may not be justified or the risk factors predisposing to TdP arrhythmias should be taken into account in further clinical studies.
Carcinoma of the penis is a malignant epithelial tumor of ominous prognosis if not adequately treated.
To a large extent the probability of positive lymph nodes is determined by the grade of the primary lesion.
In turn the number of positive nodes greatly influences the survival.
In the past the complications of radical ilioinguinal lymphadenectomy have decreased their timely indication.
If delayed lymphadenectomy is performed, the survival rate is reduced by approximately 50 % as compared to the results of immediate lymphadenectomy.
The modified inguinal lymphadenectomy described by Catalona leads to less complications.
If performed without delay it should lead to improved survival in patients with higher stage and high grade penile cancer.
Recently suggested employment of adjuvant and neoadjuvant chemotherpy may further enhance the survival.
On the basis of existing models for psychodynamic diagnostic evaluation and psychoanalytic interview technique and of the theoretical concepts of the 5 axes of the OPD diagnosis, a new type of the psychodynamic assessment interview is presented.
The examination is structured in 5 phases: the opening scene, exploration of specific examples for relationships, exploration of experience of self and others, of therapy motivation, and finally clarifying the preconditions for treatment and the ability for insight.
The syndrome diagnosis according to ICD 10 is completed in a final phase.
This psychodynamic-diagnostic assessment interview is recommended, apart from the use for OPD diagnosis, for use a clinical instrument.
Cryptococcal meningitis is one of the most frequent forms of meningoencephalitis in AIDS patients.
Before the introduction of triazol antibiotics like difluconazole, the frequency of this meningitis among AIDS patients was 5-10%, yet declined during the last years.
Clinically, nonspecific signs of a meningeal inflammation predominate while focal neurological signs are rare.
Rapid institution of high-dose antimycotic therapy is the keystone to improve prognosis and decrease mortality.
Antimycotics of choice are amphotericin B, fluconazole, and flucytosin.
Diagnosis is established by detection of cryptococcal antigen in cerebrospinal fluid, microscopic demonstration of cryptococci using India-ink, and cryptococcal cultures.
Recent developments aim to improve antimycotic therapies.
During the last years, life-long secondary prevention with difluconazole was established.
Cryptococci which are resistent against fluconazole and amphotericin B are a special challenge, yet fortunately are rare.
Longterm outcome of patients is determined by the progression of the underlying immunsuppression.
Therefore, combination of secondary prophylaxis with modern antiviral substances is important.
Clinical decision analysis in patients with suspected cryptococcal meningitis is presented using methods from evidence-based medicine.
The effect of aprotinin (2000000 IU as a bolus +500000 JU/h until the end of the operation) on transfusion requirements and coagulation parameters in orthotopic liver transplantation (study group: n=9; placebo group: n=9) was investigated in a randomised, double-blind study.
Coagulation parameters were monitored intraoperatively using a mobile laboratory.
In contrast to the published results, no effect on transfusion requirements could be demonstrated.
